[3001]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the back of the camel at Mina, and a person came to him," and the rest of the hadith Is like that transmitted by Ibn 'Uyaina.
[3002]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-As (Allah be pleased with them) said: As Allah's Messenger (may peace be'upon him) was standing near the jamra, a person came to him on the Day of Nahr and said: Messenger of Allah, I got (my head shaved) before throwing pebbles, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Throw pebbles (now); there is no harm in it. Another man (then) came and said: I have sacrificed before throwing the stones. He said: Throw stones (now) and there is no harm. Another came to him and said: I have observed the circumambulation of Ifada of the House before throwing pebbles. He said: Throw pebbles (now); there is no harm in it, He (the narrator) said: I did not see that he (the Holy Prophet) was asked about anything on that day, but he said: Do, and there is no harm in it.
[3003]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that it was said to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about sacrificing of animals, shaving of one's head, throwing of pebbles, and (the order of) precedence and succession, and he said: There is no harm in it.
[3004]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observed the circumambulation of Ifada on the Day of Nabr (10th of Dhu'l-Hijja), and then came back and observed the noon prayer at Mina. Nafi' (one of the narrators) said that Ibn Umar used to observe the circomambulation of Ifada on the Day of Nahr, and then return and observe the noon prayer at Mina, and mentioned that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did that.
[3005]
Abd al-'Aziz b. Rufai' (Allah be pleased with him) said: I asked Anas b. Malik to tell me about something he knew about Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), viz. where he observed the noon prayer on Yaum al-Tarwiya. He said: At Mina. I said: Where did he observe the afternoon prayer on the Yaum an-Nafr? and he said: It was at al-Abtah. He then said: Do as your rulers do.
[3006]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and Abu Bakr and 'Umar observed halt at al-Abtah.
[3007]
Nafi' reported that Ibn 'Umar regarded halt at Muhassab as Sunnah (of the Holy Prophet) and observed the noon prayer on Yaum al-Nafr at that place. Nafi' said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) halted at Muhassab and the Caliphs did the same after him.
[3008]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported.: Halt at al-Abtah is not the Sunnah. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) halted there simply because it was easier for him to depart from there, when he left.
[3009]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[3010]
Salim reported that Abu Bakr, 'Umar and Ibn Umar used to halt at Abtah. 'Urwa narrated from 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) that he did not observe this practice and said : Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) halted there, for it is a place from where it was easy to depart.
[3011]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Halt at Muhassab is not something (significant from the point of view of the Shari'ah). It is a place of halt where Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) halted.
[3012]
Abu Rafi' reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not command me to observe halt at al-Abtah when be departed from Mina, but I came and set up his (the Holy Prcphet's) tent (of my own accord); and he (Allah's Apostle) came and observed halt. This hadith is narrated through another chain of transmitters from Abu Rafi' who was (in charge) of the luggage of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[3013]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleated with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: God willing, we will get down tomorrow, at Khaif of Banu Kinanah, the place where they had taken an oath on unbelief.
[3014]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to us as we were at Mina: We would observe halt tomorrow at-Khaif of Banu Kinanah, where (the polytheists) had taken an oath on unbelief, and that was that the Quraish and Banu Kinanah had, pledged against Banu Hashim and Banu Muttalib that they would neither marry nor do any transaction with them unless they deliver Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) to them. And (this pledge was) taken at this (place) Muhassab.
[3015]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: God willing, when Allah has granted us victory, our halt tomorrow will be at Khaif, where they (the unbelievers of Mecca) had taken an oath on unbelief.
[3016]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that al-'A'bbas b. Abd al-Muttalib (Allah be pleased with him) sought permission from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to spend in Mecca the nights (which be was required to spend) at Mina on account of his office of supplier of water, and he (the Holy Prophet) granted him permission.
[3017]
A hadith like this has been narrated by 'Ubaidullah b. Umar with the the same chain of transmitters.
[3018]
Bakr b. 'Abdullah al-Muzani said: While I was sitting along with Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) near the Ka'ba, there came a bedouin to him and said: What is the matter that I see that the progeny of your uncle supply honey and milk (as drink to the travellers), whereas you supply al-nabidh (water sweetened with dates)? Is it due to your poverty or due to your close-fistedness? Thereupon Ibn 'Abbas said: Allah be praised, it is neither due to poverty nor due to close-fistedness (but due to the fact) that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came here riding his she-came, and there was sitting behind him Usama. He asked for water, and we gave him a cup full of nabidh and he drank it, and gave the remaining (part) to Usama; and he (the Holy Prophet) said: You have done Food, You have done well. So continue doing like it So we do not like to change what Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had commanded us to do.
[3019]
'All (Allah be pleased with him) reperted: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) put me in charge of his sacrificial animals, that I should give their flesh. skins and saddle cloths as sadaqa, but not to give anything to the butcher, saying: We would pay him ourselves.
[3020]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abd al-Karim al-Jazari with the same chain of transmitters.
[3021]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) with another chain of transmitters, but there is no mention of the wages of the butcher in it.
[3022]
Ali b. Abi Talib (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) put him in charge of his sacrificial animals, and commanded him to distribute the whole of their meat, hides, and saddle cloths to the poor, and not to give to the butcher anything out of them.
[3023]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Hadrat 'Ali (Allah be pleased with him).
[3024]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) reported: In the year of Hudaibiya (6 H ), we, along with Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him), sacrificed a camel for seven persons and a cow for seven persons.
[3025]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We set out in the state of Ihram for Hajj along, with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He commanded us that seven perons should join in a camel and a cow for offering sacrifice.
[3026]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We performed Hajj along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and we sacrificed a camel on behalf of seven persons, and a cow on behalf of seven persons.
[3027]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We joined Allah's Apostle (may pea,@.e be upon him) in Hajj and Umra and seven persons shared in the sacrifice of an animal. A person said to Jabir (Allah be pleased with him): Can seven persons share in the sacrifice of al-Badnah (a camel) as he shares in al- Jazur (a cow)? He, (Jabir) said: It (al-Jazur) is nothing but one among the budun. Jabir was present at Hudaibiya and he said: We sacrificed on that day seventy camel, and seven men shared in each sacrifice (of camel).
[3028]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them), describing the Hajj of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: He (the Holy Prophet) commanded us as we had entered into the state of Ihram to sacrifice the animals (as a rite of Hajj) and a group (of person; amongst us, i.e. seven) shared in the sacrifice of one (camel or cow), and it happened at that time when he commanded them to put off Ihram for Hajj (after performing 'Umra).
[3029]
Jaibir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We performed Hajj Tamattu' along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and we slaughtered a cow on behalf of seven persons sharing in it.
[3030]
Jabir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sacrificed a cow on behalf of 'A'isha on the Day of Nahr (10th of Dhu'l-Hijja).
[3031]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sacrificed (animals) on behalf of his wives, and in the hadith transmitted by Ibn Abu Bakr (the words are): "A cow on behalf of 'A'isha on the occasion of the Hajj."
[3032]
Ziyad b. Jubair reported that Ibn 'Umar came upon a person who was slaughtering (sacrificing) his camel and had made him kneel down. So he told him to make it stand up festered (and then sacrifice it) according to the Sunnah of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him).
[3033]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent the sacrificial animals from Medina. I wove garlands for his sacrificial animals (and then he hung them round their necks), and he would not avoid doing anything which the Muhrim avoids A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Shihab.
[3034]
'A'isha narrated (in another badith narrated through another chain of transmitters) these words: "As if I am seeing myself weaving the garlands for the sacrificial animals of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)."
[3035]
Abd al-Rahman b. al-Qasim reported on the authority of his father that he heard 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) saying: I used to weave garlands for the sacrificial animals of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with these hands of mine, but he (Allah's Apostle) neither avoided anything nor gave up anything (which a Muhrim should avoid or give up).
[3036]
'A'isha reported: I wove the garlands for the sacrificial animals of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with my own bands, and then he (the Holy Prophet) marked them, and garlanded them, and then sent them to the House, and stayed at Medina and nothing was forbidden to him which was lawful for him (before).
[3037]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent the sacrificial animals and I wove garlands for them with my own 'hands, and he did not refrain from doing anything which he did not avoid in the state of non-Muhrim.
[3038]
Al-Qasim reported the Mother of the Faithful (Hadrat 'A'isha Siddiqa) (Allah be pleased with her) as saying: I used to weave these garlands from the multicoloured wool which was with us. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was in the state of non Muhrim among us, and he would do all that was lawful for a lion-Muhrim with his wife.
[3039]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I recall how I wove garlands for the sacrificial animals (the goats) of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He sent them and then stayed with us as a non-Muhrim.
[3040]
'A'isha (Allah,be pleased,with her) reported: I often wove garlands for the sacrificial animals of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and he garlanded his sacrificial animals, and then he sent them and stayed in the ouse) avoiding nothing which a Muhrim avoids.
[3041]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon, him) sent some goats as sacrificial animals to the House and He garlanded them.
[3042]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: We used to garland the goats and send them (to Mecca), and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stayed back in Medina as a non-Muhrim ard nothing was forbidden for him (which is forbidden for a Muhrim).
[3043]
'Amra daughter of Abd al-Rahman reported that Ibn Ziyad had written to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with him) that 'Abdullah b. Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) bad said that he who sent a sacrificial animal (to Mecca) for him was forbidden what is forbidden for a pilgrim (in the state of Ihram) until the animal is sacrificed I have myself sent my sacrificial animal (to Mecca), so write to me your opinion. Amra reported 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) as saying: It is not as Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) had asserted, for I wove the garlands for the sacrificial animals of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with my own hands. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) then garlanded them with his own hands, and then sent them with my father, and nothing was forbidden for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which had been made lawful for him by Allah until the animals were sacrificed.
[3044]
Masruq reported: I heard 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) clapping her hands behind the curtain and saying: I used to weave garlands for the sacrificial animals of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with my own hands, and then he (the Holy Prophet) sent them (to Mecca), and he did not avoid doing anything which a Muhritn avoids until his animal was sacrificed.
[3045]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) through another chain of transmitters.
[3046]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) rerorted that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw a person who was driving a sacrificial camel (and told him to ride on it. Thereupon he said: Messenger of Allah, it is a sacrificial camel. He told him again to ride on it; (when he received the same reply) he said: Woe to you, (he uttered these words on the second or the third reply).
[3047]
This hadith has been narrated by A'raj with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "Whereas the person was driving a sacrificial camel which was garlanded."
[3048]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: It is one out of these (narrations) that Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) narrated to us from Muhammad the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and he narrated to us traditions out of which is that he said : When there was a person who was driving a garlanded sacrificial camel, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Woe to you; ride on it. He said: Messenger of Allah, it is a sacrificial animal, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Woe to you, ride on it; woe to you, ride on it.
[3049]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by a person who was driving a sacrificial camel, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Ride on It. He said: It is a sacrificial camel. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said twice or thrice: Ride on it.
[3050]
Anas reported: Someone happened to pass by Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) with a sacrificial camel, or a sacrificial animal, whereupon he said: Ride on it. He said: It is a sacrificial camel, or animal, whereupon he said: (Ride) even if (it is a sacrificial camel).
[3051]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: There happened to pass (a person) with a sacrificial camel by Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and the rest of the hadith is the same.
[3052]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that he was asked about riding on a sacrificial animal, and he said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Ride on it gently, when you have need for it, until you find (another) mount.
[3053]
Abu Zubair reported: I asked Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) about riding on the sacrificial animal, to which he replied: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Ride on them gently until you find another mount.
[3054]
Musa b. Salama al-Hudhali reported: I and Sinan b. Salama proceeded (to Mecca to perform Umra. Sinan had a sacrificial camel with him which he was driving. The camel stopped in the way being completely exhausted and this state of it made him (Sinan) helpless.(He thought) if it stops proceeding further how he would be able to take it ,along with him and said: I would definitely find out (the religious verdict) about it. I moved on in the morning and as we encamped at al-Batha', (Sinan) said: Come (along with me) to Ibn 'Abbis (Allah be pleased with them) so that we should narrate to him (this incident), and he (Sinan) reported to him the incident of the sacrificial camel. He (Ibn Abbas) said: You have referred (the matter) to the well informed person. (Now listen) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent sixteen sacrificial camels with a man whom he put in change of them. He set out and came back and said: Messenger of Allah, what should I do with those who are completely exhausted and become powerless to move on, whereupon he said: Slaughter them, and dye their hoofs in their blood, and put them on the sides of their humps, but neither you nor anyone among those who are with you must eat any part of them.
[3055]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent eighteen sacrificial camels with a person. The rest of the hadith is the same, and the first part (of the above-mentioned hadith) is not mentioned.
[3056]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Dhuwaib, father of Qabisa (Allah be pleased with him) narrated to him that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent under his charge the sacrificial camels, and said: If any of these is completely exhausted and you apprehend its death, then slaughter it, then dip its hoofs in its blood and imprint it on its hump; but neither you nor any one of your comrades should eat it.
[3057]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the people used to return through every path, whereupon Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) said: None amongst you should depart until he performs the last circumambulation round the House. Zuhair said (the words are): [ARABIC: YANSWARIFUWN KULLA WAJH] and the word [arabic:FIY] was not mentioned.
[3058]
Ibn Abbas reported: The people were commanded (by the Holy Prophet) to perform the last circumambulation round the House, but menstruating women were exempted.
[3059]
Tawus reported: I was in the company of Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) when Zaid b. Thabit said: Do you give religious verdict that the woman who is in menses is allowed to go without performing the last circumambulation of the House? Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) said to him: Ask such and such woman of the Ansar, if you do not (believe my religious verdict) whether Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had coimmanded her this. Zaid b Thabit (went to that lady and after getting this verdict attested by her) came back to Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) smilingly and said: I did not find you but telling the truth.
[3060]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Safiyyah bint Huyayy entered the period of menses after performing Tawaf Ifada. I made a mention of her menses to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereupon Allah's.Messenger (may peace be upon him) remarked: Well, then she will detain us. I said: Messenger of Allah. she has performed Tawif Ifada and circumambulated the House, and it was after this that she entered the period of menses. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: (If it is so), then proceed forth.
[3061]
This hadith is narrated (from 'A'isha) on the authority of Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): Safiyyah bint Huyayy, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), entered the period of menses at the occasion of the Farewell Pilgrimage after she had performed Tawaf Ifada in the state of cleanliness; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[3062]
Abd al-Rahman b. al Qasim narrated on the authority of 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) that she made a mention to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that Safiyyah had entered the period of menses. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[3063]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: We feared that Safiyyah might have entered the period of menses before performing Tawaf Ifada. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to us and said: Is Safiyyah going to detain us? Thereupon we said: She has performed Tawaf Ifada. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Then there is no detention (for us) now.
[3064]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him): Messenger of Allah, Safiyyah bint Huyayy has entered the state of menses, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Perhaps she is going to detain us. Has she not clicumambulated the House along with you (i.e. whether she has not performed Tawaf Ifada)? They said: Yes. He said: Then they should set out.
[3065]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) inclined to do with Safiyyah what a man feels inclined to do with his wife. They said: Messenger of Allah, she has entered the state of menses, whereupon he said: (Well) she is going to detain us. They (his wives) said: Messenger of Allah, she performed Tawaf Ziyara (Tawaf Ifada) on the Day of Nahr. Thereupon he said: Then she should proceed along with you
[3066]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) decided to march (for return journey), he found Safiyyah at the door of her tent, sad and downcast. He remarked. Barren, shaven-head, you are going to detain us, and then said: Did you perform Tawaf Ifada on the Day of Nahr? She replied in the affirmative, whereupon he said: Then march on.
[3067]
This hadith is narrated by 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) through another chain of transmitters, but no mention is made of "sad and downcast".
[3068]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace, be upon him) entered the Ka'ba. Usama, Bilal and 'Uthman b. Talha, the keeper (of the Ka'ba), were along with him. He closed the door and stayed in it for some time. Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said: I asked Bilal as he came out what Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had done there. He said: He prayed there in (such a position) that two pillars were on his left side, one pillar on his right, and three pillars were behind him, and the House at that time was resting on six pillars.
[3069]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came on the Day of Victory, and got down in the courtyard of the Ka'ba and he sent (a message) for 'Uthman b. Talha (Allah be pleased with them). He came with the key and opened the door. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) then entered therein and Bilal, Usama b. Zaid, and 'Uthman b. Talha (along with him), and then commanded the door to be closed. They stayed there for a considerable time, and then the door was opened, and Abdullah said: I was the first to meet Allah's Messenger. (may peace be upon him). outside (the Ka'ba), and Bilal was close behind him. I said to Bilal: Did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observe prayer therein? He said: Yes. I said: Where? He said: Between the two pillars in front of his face. He said: I forgot to ask him as to the number of rakahs he prayed.
[3070]
lbn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came daring the year of Victory on the she-camel of Usama b. Zaid until he made her kneel down in the courtyard of the Ka'ba (and got down). He then sent for 'Uthman b. Talha and said: Bring me the key. He went to his mother and she refused to give that to him. He said: By Allah, give that to him or this sword would be thrust into my side. So she gave that to him, and he came with that to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and gave that to him, and he opened the door. The rest of the hadith is the same as the above one.
[3071]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger,(may peace be upon him) entered the House, and Usama, Bilal and Uthman b. Talha were with him, and they kept the door closed for a considerable time. Then it was opened and I was the first to enter the House and meet Bilal, and I said: Where did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observe prayer? He said: Between these two front pillars. I, however, forgot to ask him the number of rak'ahs that he observed.
[3072]
Abdullah b. Umar reported that he reached the Ka'ba and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had entered therein, and Bilal and Usama too. 'Uthman b. Talha closed the door to them, and they stayed there for a considerable time, and then the door was opend and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came out, and I went upstairs and entered the House and said: Where did Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) observe prayer? They said: At this very place. I, however, forgot to ask them about the (number of) rak'ahs that he observed.
[3073]
Salim narrated on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with him) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) entered the House along with Usama b. Zaid, Bilal and Uthman b. Talha. They closed the door from within, and, as they opened it, I was the first to get into it and meet Bilal, and I asked him: Did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observe prayer in it? He said: Yes, he observed prayer between these two Yemenite pillars (pillars situated towards the side of Yemen).
[3074]
Salim b. Abdullah reported his father (Allah be pleased with him) saying: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) entering the Ka'ba, and Usama b. Zaid, Bilal and 'Uthman b. Talha were along with him, but none (else) entered therein along with them. Then the door was closed for them from within. 'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said: Bilal and Uthman b. Talha informed me that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observed prayer in the interior of the Ka'ba between the two Yemenite pillars.
[3075]
Ibn Juraij reported: I said to 'Ata': Have you heard Ibn 'Abbas saying: You have been commanded to observe circumambulation, and not commanded to enter it (the Ka'ba) ? He ('Ata') said: He (Ibn Abbas) (at the same time) did not forbid entrance into it. I, however, heard him saying: Usama b. Zaid informed me that when Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) entered the House, he supplicated in all sides of it; and he did not observe prayer therein till he came out, and as he came out he observed two rak'ahs in front of the House, and said: This is your Qibla. I said to him: What is meant by its sides? Does that mean its corners? He said: (In all sides and nooks of the House) there is Qibla.
[3076]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) entered the Ka'ba, and in it there were six pillars, and he stood near a pillar and made supplication, bnt did not observe the prayer.
[3077]
Isma'il b. Abu Khalid reported: I asked Abdullah b. Abu Aufa (Allah be pleased with him), a Companion of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whether Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had entered the House, while performing 'Umra, He said: NO.
[3078]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger may peace be upon him) said to me: Had your people not been unbelievers in the recent past (had they not quite recently accepted Islam), I would have demolished the Ka'ba and would have rebuilt it on the foundation (laid) by Ibrahim; for when the Quraish had built the Ka'ba, they reduced its (area), and I would also have built (a door) in the rear.
[3079]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[3080]
'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as having said this: Didn't you see that when your people built the Ka'ba, they reduced (its area with the result that it no longer remains) on the foundations (laid) by Ibrahim. I said: Messenger of Allah, why don't you rebuild it on the foundations (laid by) Ibrahim? Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Had your people not been new converts to Islam, I would have done that. 'Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said: If 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) had heard it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be up(vn him), I would not have seen Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) abandoning the touching of the two corners situated near al-Hijr, but (for the fact) that it was not completed on the foundations (laid) by Ibrihim.
[3081]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her), wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If your people, had not been recent converts to Islam, I would have spent the treasure of the Ka'ba in the way of Allah and would have constructed its door just on the level of the ground and would have encompassed in it the space of Hijr.
[3082]
'Abdullah b. Zubair (Allah be pleased with him) reported on the authority of his mother's sister ('A'isha) saying that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: 'A'isha, if your people had not been recently polytheists (and new converts to Islam), I would have demolished the Ka'ba, and would have brought it to the level of the ground and would have constructed two doors, one facing the east and the other one to the west, and would have added to it six cubits of area from Hijr, for the Quraish had reduced it when they rebuilt it.
[3083]
'Ata' reported: The House was burnt during the time of Yazid b. Muawiya when the people of Syria had fought (in Mecca). And it happened with it (the Ka'ba) what was (in store for it). Ibn Zubair (Allah be pleased with him) felt it (in the same state) until the people came in the season (of Hajj). (The idea behind was) that he wanted to exhort them or incite them (to war) against the people of Syria. When the people had arrived he said to them: O people, advise me about the Ka'ba. Should I demolish it and then build it from its very foundation, or should I repair whatever has been damaged of it? Ibn 'Abbas said: An idea has occurred to me according to which I think that you should only repair (the portion which has been) damaged, and leave the House (in that very state in which) people embraced Islam (and leave those very stones in the same state) when people embraced Islam, and over which Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had raised it. Thereupon Ibn Zubair said: It the house of any one of you is burnt, he would not be contented until he had reconstructed it, then what about the House of your Lord (which is far more Important than your house)? I would seek good advice from my Lord thrice and then I would make up (my mind) about this affair. After seeking good advice thrice, he made up his mind to demolish it. The people apprehended that calamity might fall from heaven on those persons who would be first to climb (over the building for the purpose of demolishing it), till one (took up courage, and ascended the roof), and threw down one of its stones. When the people saw no calamity befalling him, they followed him, demolished it until it was razed to the ground. Then Ibn Zubair erected pillars and hung cartains on them (in order to provide facilities to the people for observing the time of its construction). And the walls were raised; and Ibn Zubair said: I heard 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) say that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had observed: If the people had Rot recently (abandoned) unbelief, find I had means enough to reconstruct it, which I had not, I would have definitely excompassed in it five cubits of area from Hijr. And I would also have constructed a door for the people to enter, and a door for their exit. I today have (the means to spend) and I entertain no fearfrom the side of people (that they would protest against this change). So he added five cubits of area from the side of Hatim to it that there appeared (the old) foundation (upon which Hadrat Ibrahim had built the Ka'ba). and the people saw that and it was upon this foundation that the wall was raised. The length of the Ka'ba was eighteen cubits. when addition was made to it (which was in its breadth), then naturally the length appears to be) small (as compared with its breadth). Then addition of ten cubits (of area) was made in its length (also). Two doors were also constructed, one of which (was meant) for entrance and the other one for exit. When Ibn Zubair (Allah be pleased with him) was killed, Hajjaj wrote to 'Abd al-Malik (b. Marwan) informing him about it, and telling him that Ibn Zubair (Allah be pleased with him) had built (the Ka'ba) on those very foundations (which were laid by Ibrahim) and which reliable persons among the Meccans had seen. 'Abd al-Malik wrote to him: We are not concerned with the censuring of Ibn Zubair in anything. Keep intact the addition made by him in the side of length, and whatever he has added frem the side of Hijr revert to (its previous) foundation, and wall up the door which he had opened. Thus Hajjaj at the command of Abd al-Malik) demolished it (that portion) and rebuilt it on (its previous) foundations.
[3084]
Abdullah b. 'Ubaid reported that Harith b. 'Abdullah led a deputation to 'Abd al-Malik b. Marwan during his caliphate. 'Abd al-Malik said: I do riot think that Abu Khubaib (i.e. Ibn Zabair) had heard from 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) (about the intended wish of the Holy Prophet [may peace be upon him) In regard to the alteration of the Ka'ba). Harith said: Yes, I myself did hear from her. He ('Abd al-Malik) said: Well, tell me what you heard from her. He stated that she (Hadrat 'A'isha) had said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) remarked: Verily your people have reduced (the area) of the House from its (original foundations, and if they had not recently abandoned polytheism (and embraced Islam) I would have reversed it to (those foundations) which they had left out of it. nd if your people would take initiative after me in rebuilding it, then come along with me so that I should show you what they have left out of it. He showed her about fifteen cubits of area from the side of Hatim (that they had separated). This is the narration transmitted by 'Abdullah b. Ubaid. Walid b. 'Ata' has, however, made this addition to it: "Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: I would have made two doors on the level of the ground (facing) the east and the west. Do you know why your people raised the level of its door (i.e. the door of the Ka'ba)? She said: No. He said: (They did it) out of vanity so that (they might be in a position) to grant admittance to him only whom they wished. When a person intended to get into it, they let him climb (the stairs), and as he was about to enter, they pushed him and he fell down." 'Abd al-Malik said to Harith; Did you yourself hear her saying this? He said: Yes. He (Harith) said that he ('Abd al-Malik) scratched the ground with his staff for some time and then said: I wish I had left his (Ibn Zubair's) work there.
[3085]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Juraij with the same chain of transmitters.
[3086]
Abu Qaza'ah reported that while Abd al-Malik b. Marwan was circumambulating the Ka'ba he said: May Allah ruin Ibn Zubair that he lies in attributing to the Mother of the Faithful, as he says: I heard her stating that Allah's Messenger (may'peace be upon him) had said: 'A'isha, if your people had not been new converts to Islam, I would have demolished the House and would have added (in it area) from the Hijr for your people have reduced the area from its foundations. Harith b. 'Abdullah b. Abu Rabi'a (Allah be pleased with him) said: Commander of the Faithful, don't say that, for I heard the Mother of the Faithful saying this, whereupon he said: If I had heard this before demolishing it, I would have left it in the state in which Ibn Zabair had built it.
[3087]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about the wall, circumpassing the House (i.e. whether the wall on the side of Hijr was included in the Ka'ba). He said, Yes. I said: Then why did they not include it in the House? He said: 'Your people ran short of the means (to do so). I said: Why is it that the level of its door is raised high? He said: Your people did it so that they should admit one whom they liked, and forbid him whom they disliked, and if your people were not new converts to faith, and I did not apprehend that their hearts would feel agitated at this. I would have definitely included (the area of) this wall-in the House and would have brought the door to the level of the ground.
[3088]
'A'isha reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about Hijr, and the rest of the hadith is the same. I also said: Why is it that the door has been made on a higher level, and one cannot (get into it) but with the help of a ladder? The rest of the hadith is the same as reported above and the concluding words are: (I do not change it) out of the apprehension that their hearts may disapprove of it."
[3089]
'Abdullah b. 'Abbas reported that while al-Fadl b. Abbas had been riding behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a women of the tribe of Khath'am came to him (to the Holy Proppet) asking for a religious verdict. Fadl looked at her and she looked at him. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) turned the face of al-Fadl to the other side. She said: Messenger of Allah, there is an obligation from Allah upon His servants in regard to Hajj. (But) my father is an aged man; he is incapable of riding safely. May I perform Hajj on his behalf? He said: Yes. It was during the Farewell Pilgrimage.
[3090]
Fadl reported that a woman of Banu Khath'am said: Messenger of Allah, my father is very old. There is an old obligation of Hajj upon him from Allah, but he is not capable of sitting on the back of the camel. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Perform Hajj on his behalf.
[3091]
Ibn Abbas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) met some riders at al-Rauha and asked who they were. They replied that they were Muslims. They said: Who art thou? He said: (I am) Messengef of Allah. A woman (then) lifted up a boy to him and said: Would this child be credited with having performed the Hajj? Thereupon he said: Yes, and you will have a reward.
[3092]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: A woman lifted up her child and said: Messenger of Allah, would the child be credited with having performed the Hajj? Thereupon he said: Yes, and there would be a reward for you.
[3093]
Karaib reported: A woman lifted a child and said: Messenger of Allah, would he be credited with Hajj ? He said: Yes. and for you there would be a reward.
[3094]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas through another chain of transmitters.
[3095]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressed us and said: O people, Allah has made Hajj obligatory for you; so perform Hajj. Thereupon a person said: Messenger of Allah, (is it to be performed) every year? He (the Holy Prophet) kept quiet, and he repeated (these words) thrice, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If I were to say "Yes," it would become obligatory (for you to perform it every year) and you would not be able to do it. Then he said: Leave me with what I have left to you, for those who were before you were desroyed because of excessive questioning, and their opposition to their apostles. So when I command you to do anything, do it as much as it lies in your power and when I forbid you to do anything, then abandon it.
[3096]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A woman should not set out on three (days' journey) except when she has a Mahram with her.
[3097]
This hadith has been narrated on the same authority by Ubaidullah. And in the narration of Abu Bakr (the words are): "More than three (days)." Ibn Numair narrated on the authority of his father, (and the words are): "Three (days) except (when) she has a Mahram with her."
[3098]
'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah -be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not lawful for a woman who believes in Allah and the Hereafter to travel for more than three nights journey except when there is a Mahram with her.
[3099]
Qaza'ah reported: I heard a hadith from Abu Sa'id (Allah be pleased with him) and it impressed me (very much), so I said to him: Did you hear it (yourself) from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) ? Thereupon he said: (Can) I speak of anything about Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which I did not bear? He said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: Do not set out on a journey (for religious devotion) but for the three mosques-for this mosque of mine (at Medina) the Sacred Mosque (at Mecca), and the Mosque al-Aqsa (Bait al-Maqdis), and I heard him saying also: A woman should not travel for two days duration, but only when there is a Mahram with her or her husband.
[3100]
Qaza'ah reported: I heard Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) saying: I heard four things from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) which impressed me and captivated me (and one out of these is this), that he forbade a woman to undertake journey extending over two days but with her husband, or with a Mahram; and he then narrated the rest of the hadith.
[3101]
Abu Sa'id (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A woman should not set out on three (days') journey, but in the company of a Mahram.
[3102]
Abu Sa'id Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: A woman should not set out on a journey extending beyond three nights but with a Mahram.
[3103]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters and he said: "More than three (days) except in the company of a Mahram."
[3104]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not lawful for a Muslim woman to travel a night's journey except when there is a Mahram with her.
[3105]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not lawful for a woman who believes in Allah and the Hereafter to undertake a day's journey except in the company of a Mahram.
[3106]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not lawful for a woman believing in Allah and the Hereafter to undertake journey extending over a day and a night except when there is a Mahram with her.
[3107]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not lawful for a woman to undertake three (days,) journey except when there is a Mahram with her.
[3108]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not lawful for a woman believing in Allah and the Hereafter to undertake journey extending over three days or more, except when she is in the company of her father, or her son, or her husband, or her brother, or any other Mahram.
[3109]
A hadith like this has been narrated by A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[3110]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) delivering a sermon and making this observation: "No person should be alone with a woman except when there is a Mahram with her, and the woman should not undertake journey except with a Mahram." A person stood up and said: Allah's Messenger, my wife has set out for pilgrimage, whereas I am enlisted to fight in such and such battle, whereupon he said: "You go and perform Hajj with your wife."
[3111]
A hadith like this has been narrated by 'Amr on the authority of the same chain of transmitters.
[3112]
Ibn Juraij narrated this hadith with the same chain of transmitters, but he made no mention of it: "No person should be alone with a woman except when there is a Mahram with her."
[3113]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that whenever Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) mounted his camel while setting out on a journey, he glorified Allah (uttered Allah-o-Akbar) thrice, and then said: Hallowed is He Who subdued for us this (ride) and we were not ourselves powerful enough to use It as a ride, and we are going to return to our Lord. O Allah, we seek virtue and piety from Thee in this journey of ours and the act which pleaseth Thee. O Allah, lighten this journey of ours, and make its distance easy for us. O Allah, Thou art (our) companion during the journey, and guardian of (our) family. O Allah, I seek refuge with Thee from hardships of the journey, gloominess of the sights, and finding of evil changes in property and family on return. And he (the Holy Prophet) uttered (these words), and made this addition to them: We are returning, repentant, worshipping our Lord. and praising Him.
[3114]
Abdullah b. Sarjis (Allah be pleased with him) reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) set forth on a journey, he sought refuge (with Allah) from the hardships of the travelling, and finding of evil changes on return, and disgrace after honour, and the curse of the oppressed and a gloomy sad scene in family and property.
[3115]
A hadlth like this has been narrated on the authority of Asim With the same chain of transmitters except (this difference) that the hadith transmitted by 'Abd al-Wahid (one of the narrators) the (word) "property" precedes the family, and in the hadith transmitted by Mahammad b. Khazim (the word) "family" precedes (theword "Property"), on returning home, in the narrations of both the narrators (these words are found): "O Allah I seek refuge with Thee from the hardships of the journey."
[3116]
Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that whenever Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came back from the battle or from expeditions or from Hajj or Umra and as he reached the top of the hillock or upon the elevated hard ground, he uttered Allah-o- Akbar thrice, and then said: There is no god but Allah. He is One, there is no partner with Him, His is the sovereignty and His is the praise and He is Potent over everything. (We are) returning,repenting, worshipping, prostrating before our Lord, and we praise Him Allah fulfilled His promise and helped His servant, and routed the confederates alone.
[3117]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Umar through another chain of transmitters (but with one alteration) that here Allah-o-Akbar is mentioned twice.
[3118]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I and Abu Talha (both) came back along with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). Safiyyah (the wife of the Holy Prophet) rode behind him on his camel and as we came to the out- skirts of Medina he said: (We are those) who return, who repent, who worship our Lord, who praise (Him), and he went on uttering this until we entered Medina.
[3119]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3120]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made (his camel) kneel down (i,e. halt at the stony ground of Dhu'l-Hulaifa) and prayed there, and so did Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them).
[3121]
Nafi' reported that 'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) used to halt his camel in the stony ground at Dhu'l-Hulaifa, where Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to make a halt (and pray).
[3122]
Nafi' reported that when 'Abdullah b. 'Umar returned from Hajj or 'Umra he made his camel kneel down (i.e. halted) in the stony ground of Dhu'l-Hulaifa where Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had made his camel halt.
[3123]
Salim (b. Abdullah b. 'Umar) reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with them) that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was visited by (someone, i.e. an angel) during the fag end of the night at Dhu'l-Hulaifa, and it was said to him: Verily it is a blessed stony-ground.
[3124]
Salim b. Abdullah b. Umar reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with them) that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came to Dhu'l- Hulaifa in the heart of the valley at the fag end of the night, and it was said to him: It is a blessed stony ground. Musa (one of the narrators) said: Salim made his came) halt at the mosque where 'Abdullah made his camel halt as seeking the place of stay of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). It is, in fact, situated at a lower plain than the mosque, which stands in the heart of the valley, and it is between it (the mosque) (and Qibla) that that place (where Allah's Apostle used to get down for rest and prayer) is situated.
[3125]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Abu Bakr Siddiq (Allah be pleased with him) sent me during Hajj before the Farewell Pilgrimage for which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had appointed him an Amir, among a group of people whom he had ordered to make announcement to the people on the Day of Nahr: "After this year no polytheist may perform the Pilgrimage and no naked person may circumambulate the House." Ibn Shihab stated that Humaid b. Abd al-Rahman said that according to this narration of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) the day of Hajj al-Akbar (Great Hajj) is this Day of Nahr (10th of Dhu'l-Hijja).
[3126]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is no day when God sets free more servants from Hell than the Day of 'Arafa. He draws near, then praises them to the angels, saying: What do these want?
[3127]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: An Umra is an expiation for the sins committed between it and the next, and Hajj which is accepted will receive no other reward than Paradise.
[3128]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3129]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying. He who came to this House (Ka'ba) (with the intention of performing Pilgrimage), and neither spoke indecently nor did he act wickedly. would return (free from sin) as on the (very first day) his mother bore him.
[3130]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mainsur with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "He who performed Pilgrimage but neither spoke indecently nor acted wickedly."
[3131]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him).
[3132]
Usama b. Zaid b. Haritha (Allah be pleased with him) said to Alla's Messenger (may peace be upon him): Will you stay in your house at Mecca (which you abandoned at the time of migration)? Thereupon he said: Has 'Aqil left for as any land or house? And 'Aqil and Talib became the Inheritors of Abu Talib's (property), and neither Ja'far nor 'Ali inherited anything from him, for both (Ja'far and 'Ali) were Muslims whereas 'Aqil and Talib were non-Muslims.
[3133]
Usama b. Zaid (Allah be pleased with him) said: Allah's Messenger,God willing, where will you stay tomorrow? And it was at the time of the Conquest (of Mecca). Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Has 'Aqil left any accommodation for us?
[3134]
Al-'Ali' b. al-Hadrami reported Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon as saying: For a Mahijir, it is only three (days') stay at Mecca, after completing (the Hajj or 'Umra) that is allowed, and it seemed as if he was saying that he should not (stay) beyond this (period).
[3135]
Al-'Ali,' b. al-Hadrami reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Muhijir should stay at Mecca after performing the rituals (of Hajj) but for three (days) only.
[3136]
Al-'Ala' b. al-Hadrami reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is only for three nights that a Muhajir should stay at Mecca after the completion of the rituals of Hajj.
[3137]
Al-"Ala' b. al-Hadrami reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The stay at Mecca after the completion of his rituals (of Hajj) is only for three days.
[3138]
Ibn Juraij narrated this hadith with the same chain of transmitters.
[3139]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying on the Day of Victory over Mecca: There is no Hijra (emigration) but only Jihad and good intention; and when you are called to battle, then go forth. He also said on the Day of Victory over Mecca: Allah made this town sacred on the day He created the earth and the heavens; so it is -sacred by the sacred- ness conferred on it by Allah until the Day of Resurrection and fighting in it was not lawful to anyone before me, and it was made lawful for me only during an hour on one day, for it is sacred by the sacredness conferred on it by Allah until the Day of Resurrection. Its thorns are not to be cut, its game is not to be molested, and the things dropped are to be picked up only by one who makes a public announcement of it, and its fresh herbage is not to be cut. Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) said: Messenger of Allah, exception may be made in case of rush, for it is useful for their blacksmiths and for their houses. He (the Holy Prophet) conceding the suggestion of 'Abbas) said: Except rush.
[3140]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Mansur, but he did not mention: "On that very day He created the heavens and the earth," and he (the narrator) substituted the word "fighting" (qital) for "killing" (qatl), and further said: "No one is to pick up the dropped thing except one who makes a public announcement of it."
[3141]
Abu Shuraih al-'Adawi reported that he said to Amr b. Sa'id when he was sending troops to Mecca: Let me tell you something. O Commander, which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said on the day following, the Conquest which my ears heard and my heart has retained, and my eyes saw as he spoke it. He praised Allah and extolled Him and then said: Allah, not men, has made Mecca sacred; so it is not permissible for any person believing in Allah and the Last Day to shed blood in it, or lop a tree in it. If anyone seeks a concession on the basis of fighting of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), tell him that Allah permitted His Messenger, but not you, and He gave him permission only for an hour on one day, and its sacredness was restored on the very day like that of yesterday. Let him who is present convey the information to him who is absent. It was said to Abu Shuraih: What did Amr say to you? He said: I am better informed of that than you, Abu Shuraih, but the sacred territory does not grant protection to one who is disobedient, or one who runs away after shedding blood, or one who runs away after committing
[3142]
Abu Huraira, (Allah be pleased with him) reported. When Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, granted Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) victory over Mecca, he stood before people and praised and extolled Allah and then said: Verily Allah held back the elephants from Mecca and gave the domination of it to His Messenger and believers, and it (this territory) was not violable to anyone before me and it was made violable to me for an hour of a day, and it shall not be violable to anyone after me. So neither molest the game, nor weed out thorns from it. And it is not lawful for anyone to pick up a thing dropped but one who makes public announcement of it. And it a relative of anyone is killed he is entitled to opt for one of two things. Either he should be paid blood-money or he can take life as (a just retribution). 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) said: Allah's Messenger, but Idhkhir (a kind of herbage), for we use it for our graves and for our houses, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: With the exception of Idhkhir. A person known as Abu Shah, one of the people of Yemen, stood up and said: Messenger of Allah, (kindly) write it for me. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said I Write it for Abu Shah. Walid said: I asked al-Auzai': What did his saying mean: "Write it for me, Messenger of Allah"? He said: This very address that he had heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3143]
Abu Huraira(Allah be pleased with him)reported: The people of the Khuza'ah tribe killed a man of the tribe of Laith in the Year of Victory as a retaliation for one whom they had killed (whom the people of the tribe of Laith had killed). It was reported to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He mounted his camel and delivered this address: Verily Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, held back the Ele- phants from Mecca, and gave its domination to His Messenger and believers. Behold, it was not violable for anyone before me and it will not be violable for anyone after me. Behold, it was made violable for me for an hour of a day; and at this very hour it has again been made inviolable (for me as well as for others). So its thorns are not to be cut, its trees are not to be lopped, and (no one is allowed to) pick up a thing dropped, but the one who makes an announcement of it. And one whose fellow is killed is allowed to opt between two alternatives: either he should receive blood-money or get the life of the (murderer) in return. He (the narrator said): A person from the Yemen, who was called Abu Shah, came to him and said: Messenger of Allah, write it down for me, whereupon he (Allah's Messenger) said: Write it down for Abu Shah. One of the persons from among the Quraish also said: Except Idhkhir, for we use it in our houses ant our graves. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Except Idhkhir.
[3144]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) say: It is not permissible for any one of you to carry weapons in Mecca.
[3145]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) entered Mecca in the Year of Victory with a helmet on his head; and when he took it off, a man came to him and said: Ibn Khatal is hanging on to the curtains of the Ka'ba, whereupon he said: Kill him. Malik (one of the narrators) attested this statement having been made.
[3146]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah al-Ansari (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) entered Mecca and Qutaiba (another narrator) stated that he entered Mecca in the Year of Victory, wearing a black turban, but not wearing the Ihram.
[3147]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) entered on the day of Victory of Mecca wearing a black turban on his head. and she said: In case Allah cures me I will certainly go and observe prayer in Bait al-Maqdis. She recovered and so she made preparations to go out (to that place). She came to Maimuna. the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). and after greeting her she informed her about it, whereupon she said: Stay here. and eat the provision (which you had made) and observe prayer In the mosque of the Messenger (may peace be upon him). for I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: Prayer in it is better than a thousand prayers observed in other mosques except the mosque of the Ka'ba.
[3148]
Amr b. Huraith reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressed the people (on the day of the Victory of Mecca) with a black turban on his head.
[3149]
Ja'far b. 'Amr b. Huraith reported his father as saying: As if I am seeing Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the pulpit with a black turban on his head, and its two ends hanging between his shoulders. Abu Bakr (another narrator) did not make mention of: "Upon the pulpit".
[3150]
'Abdullah b. Zaid b. 'Asim (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily Ibrahim declared Mecca sacred and supplicated (for blessings to be showered) upon its inhabitants, and I declare Medina to be sacred as lbrahim had declared Mecca to be sacred. I have supplicated (Allah for His blessings to be showered) in its sa' and its mudd (two standards of weight and measurement) twice as did Ibrahim for the inhabitants of Mecca. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters with a slight varia- tion of words.
[3151]
Rafi' b. Khadij reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Ibrahim declared Mecca as sacred and I declare sacred the area between its two stony grounds (lava lands by which he meant Medina).
[3152]
Nafi' b. Jubair reported that Marwan b. al-Hakam (Allah be pleased with him) addressed people and made mention of Mecca and its inhabitants and its sacredness, but he made no mention of Medina, its inhabitants and its sacredness. Rafi' b. Khadij called to him and said: What is this that I hear you making mention of Mecca and its inhabitants and its sacredness, but you did not make mention of Medina and its inhabitants and its sacredness, while the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) has also declared sacred (the area) between its two lava lands (Medina) ? And (we have record of this) with us written on Khaulani parchment. If you like, I can read it out to you. Thereupon Marwan became silent, and then Said: I too have heard some part of it.
[3153]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Ibrahim declared Mecca as sacred; I declare Medina, that between the two mountains, as inviolable. No tree should be lopped and no game is to be molested.
[3154]
Amir b. Sa'd reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with him) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I have declared sacred the territory between the two lava plains of Medina, so its trees should not be cut down, or its game killed; and he also said: Medina is best for them if they knew. No one leaves it through dislike of it without Allah putting in it someone better than he in place of him; and no one will stay there in spite of its hardships and distress without my being an intercessor or witness on behalf of him on the Day of Resurrection.
[3155]
'Amir b. Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas reported on the authority of his father (Allah be pleased with him) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said, and then the (above-mentioned) hadith was narrated with this addition: "None should nurse ill-will towards the people of Medina, or Allah will melt him in fire like the melting of lead or the dissolution of salt in water.
[3156]
'Amir b. Sa'd reported that Sa'd rode to his castle in al-'Aqiq and found a slave cutting down the trees, or beating off their leaves, so he stripped him off his belongings. When Sa'd returned, there came to him the masters of the slave and negotiated with him asking him to return to their slave or to them what he had taken from their slave, whereupon he said: God forbid that I should return anything which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has given me as spoil, and refused to return anything to them.
[3157]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to Abu Talha (Allah be pleased with him): Find for me a servant from amongst your boys to serve me. Abu Talha went out along with me and made me sit behind him. And I used to serve Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) whenever he got down from the camel. And in one hadith he said: He proceeded and when (the mountain of) Uhud was within sight, he said: This is the mountain which loves us and we love it. And as he came close to Medina he said: O Allah, I declare (the area) between the two mountains of it (Medina) sacred just as Ibrahim declared Mecca as sacred. O Allah, bless them (the people of Medina) in their mudd and sa'.
[3158]
Anas b. Malik reported a hadith like this from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) except with this variation that he said: "I declare sacred the area between its two lava mountains."
[3159]
'Asim reported: I asked Anas b. Malik whether Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had declared Medina as sacred. He said: Yes. (the area) between so and so. He who made any innovation in it, and further said to me: It is something serious to make any innovation in it (and he who does it) there is upon him the curse of Allah, and that of the angels and of all the people, Allah will not accept from him on the Day of Resurrection either obligatory acts or the surpererogatory acts. Ibn Anas said: Or he accommodates an innovator.
[3160]
'Asim reported: I asked Anas (Allah be pleased with him) whether Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had declared Medina as sacred. He said: Yes, it is sacred, so its tree is not to be cut; and he who did that let the curse of Allah and that of the angels and of all people be upon him.
[3161]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Allah bless them in their measurements, bless them in their sa's and bless them in their mudd.
[3162]
Anas b. Malik (Allah he pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: O Allah, increase in Medina twice the blessings (Thou showered) on Mecca.
[3163]
Ibrahim al-Taimi reported on the authority of his father: 'Ali b. Abi Talib (Allah be pleased with him) addressed us and said: He who thought that we have besides the Holy Qur'an anything else that we recite, he told a lie. And this document which is hanging by the sheath of the sword contains but the ages of the camels, and the nature of the wounds. He (Hadrat 'Ali) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Medina is sacred from 'Air to Thaur; So if anyone makes an innovation or accommodates an innovator, the curse of Allah, the angels, and all persons will fall upon him, and Allah will not accept any obligatory or supererogatory act as recompense from them. And the protection granted by the Muslims is one and must be respected by the humblest of them. If anyone makes a false claim to paternity, or being a client of other than his own masters, there is upon him the curse of Allah, the angels, and all the people. Allah will not accept from him any recompense in the form of obligatory acts or supererogatory acts. The hadith transmitted on the authority of Abu Bakr and Zabair ends with (these words): The humblest among them should respect it; and what follows after it is not mentioned there, and in the hadith transmitted by them (these words are) not found: (The document was hanging) on the sheath of his sword.
[3164]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters (but at the end) these words are added: "He who violated the covenant with a Muslim, there is upon him the curse of Allah, of angels and of all people. Neither an obligatory act nor a supererogatory act would be accepted from him as recompense on the Day of Resurrection; and in the hadith transmitted by two other narrators these words are not found: "He who claimed false paternity." And in the hadith transmitted by Waki' there is no mention of the Day of Resurrection.
[3165]
A hadith like this has been narrated with the same chain of transmitters by A'mash with a slight variation of words.
[3166]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Medina is a sacred territory, so he who made any innovation in it. or gave protection to an innovator, there is upon him the curse of Allah, that of the angels and that of all the people. There would not be accepted on the Day of Resurrection either obligatory acts or supererogatory acts from him.
[3167]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters, but no mention has been made of the Day of Resurrection. But this addition is made: "The protection granted by Muslims is one and must be respected by the humblest of them. And he who broke the covenant made by a Muslim, there is a curse of Allah, of his angels, and of the whole people upon him, and neither an obligatory act nor a supererogatory act would be accepted from him as recompense on the Day of Resurrection."
[3168]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: If I were to see deer grazing in Medina, I would have never molested them, for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has stated: There is between the two lava mountains a sacred territory.
[3169]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) declared sacred the territory between two lava mountains of Medina. Abu Huraira said: If I were to find deer in the territory between the two mountains, I would not molest them, and he (the Holy Prophet) declared twelve miles of suburb around Medina as a prohibited pasture.
[3170]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that when the people saw the first fruit (of the season or of plantation) they brought it to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). When he received it he said: O Allah, bless us in our fruits; and bless us in our city; and bless us in our sa's and bless us in our mudd. O Allah, Ibrahim was Thy servant, Thy friend, and Thy apostle; and I am Thy servant and Thy apostle. He (Ibrahim) made supplication to Thee for (the showering of blessings upon) Mecca, and I am making supplication to Thee for Medina just as he made supplication to Thee for Mecca, and the like of it in addition. He would then call to him the youngest child and give him these fruits.
[3171]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was given the first fruit and he said: O Allah, shower blessings upon us in our city, and in our fruits, in our mudd and in our sa's, blessings upon blessings, and he would then give that to the youngest of the children present there.
[3172]
Abu Sa'id Maula al-Mahri reported that they were hard pressed by the distress and hardship of Medina, and he come to AbU Sa'Id al-Khudri and said to him: I have a large family (to support) and we are enduring hardships; I have, therefore, made up my mind to take my family to some fertile land. Thereupon Abu Sa'id said: Don't do that, stick to Medina, for we have come out with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and (I think that he also said) until we reached 'Usfan, and he (the Holy Prophet along with his Companions) stayed there for some nights. There the people said: By Allah, we are lying here idle, whereas our children are unprotected behind us, and we do not feel secure about them. This (apprehension of theirs) reached Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: What is this matter concerning you that has reached me? (I do not retain how he said it, whether he said like this:) By Him (in the name of Whom) I take oath, (or he said like this:) By Him in Whose Hand is my life, I made up my mind or if you like (I do not retain what word did he actually say), I should command my camel to proceed and not to let it halt until it comes to Medina and then said: Ibrahim declared Mecca as the sacred territory and it became sacred, and I declare Medina as the sacred territory-the area between the two mountains ('Air and Uhud). Thus no blood is to be shed within its (bounds) and no weapon is to be carried for fighting, and the leaves of the trees there should not be beaten off except for fodder. O Allah, bless us in our city; O Allab, bless us in our sil; O Allah, bless us in our mudd; O Allah, bless us in our sa; O Allah, bless us in our mudd. O Allah, bless us in our city. O Allah, bless with this blessing two more blessings. By Him in Whose Hand is my life, there is no ravine or mountain path of Medina which is not protected by two angels until you reach there. (He then said to the people:) Proceed, and we, therefore, proceeded and we came to Medina By Him (in Whose name) we take oath and (in Whose name) oath is taken (Hammad is in doubt about it), we had hardly put down our camel saddles on arriving at Medina that we were attacked by the people of the tribe of 'Abdullah b. Ghatafan but none dared to do it before.
[3173]
Abu Sa'id al-Kbudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: O Allah, bless us in our sa' and mud and shower with its blessings two other blessings (multiply blessings showerted upon it).
[3174]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Yabya b. Abu Kathir with the same chain of transmitters.
[3175]
Abu Sa'id Maula al-Mahri reported that he came to Abu Sa'id al-Khudri during the nights (of the turmoil) of al-Barrah, and sought his advice about leaving Medina, and complained of the high prices prevailing therein and his large family, and informed him that he could not stand the hardships of Medina and its rugged surrounding. He said to him: Woe to you; I will not advise you to do it, for I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No one will endure hardships of Medina without my being an intercessor or a witness on his behalf on the Day of Resurrectiar), if he is a Muslim.
[3176]
Abd al-Rahman reported on the authority of his father Abu Sa'id (Allah be pleased with him) that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I have declared sacred what is between the two lava grounds of Medina just as Ibrahim (peace be upon him) declared Mecca as sacred. He (the narrator) then said: Abu Sa'id caught hold of (Abu Bakr, another narrator, used the word "found") a bird in his hand and then released it from his hand and set it free.
[3177]
Sahl b. Hunif reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) pointed with his hands towards Medina and said: That is a sacred territory and a place of safety.
[3178]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: When we came to Medina, and it was an unhealthy, uncogenial place, Abu Bakr fell sick and Bilal also fell sick; and when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw the illness of his Companions he said: O Allah, make Medina as congenial to us as you made Mecca congenial or more than that; make it conducive to health, and bleesus in its sa' and in its mudd, and transfer its fever to al-juhfa.
[3179]
This hadith has been narrated by Hisham b. 'Urwa with the same chain of transmitters.
[3180]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who patiently endures the hardships of it (of this city of Medina), I would be an intercessor or a withness on his behalf on the Day of Resurrection.
[3181]
Yuhannis, the freed slave of Zubair, narrated that when he was sitting with Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) during the days of turmoil, his freed slave-girl came to him. After saluting him she said: Abu Abd al-Rahmin, I have decided to leave (Medina) for the time is hard for us, whereupon Abdullah said to her: Stay here, foolish lady, for I have heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: For one who shows endurance on the hardships and rigour of it (of Medina) I would be an intercessor or a witness on his behalf on the Day of Resurrection.
[3182]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who patiently endured the hardships and rigours of (this city, i.e. Medina), I would be his witness and intercessor on the Day of Resurrection.
[3183]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) as saying: For one among my Ummah who shows endurance against the hardships and rigours of Medina, I would be an intercessor or a witness on his behalf on the Day of Resurrection.
[3184]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3185]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None who shows endurance on the hardships of Medina, ... (the rest of the hadith is the same).
[3186]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There are at the approaches of Medina angels so that plague and the Dajjal shall not penetrate into it.
[3187]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Dajjal will come from the eastern side with the intention of attacking Medina until he will get down behind Uhud. Then the angels will turn his face towards Syria and there he will perish.
[3188]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A time will come for the people (of Medina) when a man will invite his cousin and any other near relation: Come (and settle) at (a place) where living is cheap, come to where there is plenty, but Medina will be better for them; would they know it! By Him in Whose Hand is my life, none amongst them would go out (of the city) with a dislike for it, but Allah would make his successor in it someone better than be. Behold. Medina is like furnace which eliminates from it the impurities. And the Last Hour will not come until Medina banishes its evils just as a furnace eliminates the impurities of iron.
[3189]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: I have been commanded (to migrate) to a town (Medina) which would overpower other towns. They (the people) call it Yathrib; its correct name is (in fact) Medina. It eliminates (bad) people just as a furnace removes the alloy of iron.
[3190]
This hadith has been narrated by Yabya b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "Just as a furance removes impurity," but no mention is made of iron.
[3191]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that a desert Arab swore allegiance to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He suffered frozn a severe fever in Medina (and) so he came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: Mubammad. cancel my oath of allegiance, but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) refused it. He again came and caid: Cancel my oath of allegiance. but he (the Holy Prophet) refused it. He again came to him and said: Cancel my oath of allegiance, but he refused. The desert Arab, however, went away (cancelling the allegiance himself); thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Medina is like a furnace which drives away its impurity and purifies what is good.
[3192]
Zaid b. Thabit reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is Taiba, thereby meaning Medina. It drives away impurity just as fire removes the impurity of silver.
[3193]
Jabir b. Samura (Allah be pleased with him) reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: Allah named Medina as Tabba.
[3194]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Abu'I-Qasim (Mubammad, may peace be upon him) said: He who intends to do harm to the people of this city (that is, Medina). Allah would efface him as salt is dissolved in water.
[3195]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who intends to do harm to its people (he meant Medina), Allah would efface him as salt is dissolved in water. Ibn Hatim (one of the narrators) substituted the word "harm" for "mischief".
[3196]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira by another chain of transmitters.
[3197]
Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who intends to do harm to the people of Medina, Allah would efface him just as water dissolves salt.
[3198]
Sa'd b. Malik heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying like this except (this variation) that he said: "Sudden attack or harm."
[3199]
Abu Huraira and Sa'd reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: O Allah, bless the people of Medina in their mudd, the rest of the hadith being the same, and in It (this is also mentioned): "He wo intends to do harm to its people, Allah would efface him just as salt it dissolved in water."
[3200]
Sufyan b. Abd Zuhair reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Syria will be conquered and some people will go out of Medina along with their families driving their camels. and Medina is better for them if they were to know it. Then Yemen will be conquered and some people will go out of Medina along with their families driving their camels, and Medina is better for them if they were to know it. Then Iraq will be conquered and some people will go out of it along with their families driving their camels, and Medina is better for them if they were to know it.
[3201]
Sufyan b. Abu Zuhair heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: Yemen will be conquered and some people will go away (to that country) driving their camels and carrying their families on them and those who are under their authority, while Medina is better for them if they were to know it. Then Syria will be conquered and some people will go away driving their camels along with them and carrying their families with them and those who are under their authority, while Medina is better for theni if they were to know it. Thtn lraq will be conquered and some people will go away (to that country) driving their camels and carrying their families with them and those who are under their authority. while Medina is better for them if they were to know it.
[3202]
Salid b. Musayyib heard Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) say that 'Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said about Medina: Its inhabitants will abandon it, whereas it is good for them and it will become the haunt of beasts and birds. (Imam Muslim said that Abu Safwan, one of the narrators whose name was 'Abdullah b. 'Abd al-Malik, was an orphan and I bn juraij took him under his care for ten years.)
[3203]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: They (the residents of) Medina will abandon Medina whereas it is good for them and it will be haunted by beasts and birds, and two shepherds will come out from Muzainah intending (to go) towards Medina and tending their herd, and will find nothing but wilderness there until when they will reach the mountain path of Wada, they will fall down on their faces.
[3204]
AbduUah b. Zaid al-Mazini (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: That which is between my house" and my pulpit is a garden from the gardens of Paradise.
[3205]
Abdullah b. Zaid al-Ansari heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: That which exists between my pulpit and my house is a garden from the gardens of Paradise.
[3206]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: That which exists between my house and my pulpit is a garden from the gardens of Paradise, and my pulpit is upon my cistern.
[3207]
Abu Humaid (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We went out along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the expedition of Tabuk, and Humaid further related: We proceeded until we reached the valley of Qura; and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I am going forth, so he who among you wants to move fast with me may do so; and he who likes to go slowly may do so. We proceeded until Medina wag within our sight. and he said: This is Tibba (another name of Medina); this is Ubud, the mountain which loves us and we love it.
[3208]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: Ohud is a mountain which loves us and which we love. This hadith is narrated by Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) with another chain of transmitters (and the words are): "AIlah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) cast a glance at Ubud and said: Ubud is a mountain which loves us and we love it."
[3209]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) narrated It directly from Allah's Apostle'(may peace be upon him) having said this: A prayer in my mosque is a thousand times more excellent than a prayer in any other mosque, except Masjid al-Haram (Mosque of the Ka'ba).
[3210]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Prayer in my mosque is more excellent than a thousand prayers observed in other mosques except the Masjid al- Haram.
[3211]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Prayer in the mosque of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) is more excellent than a thousand prayers in other mosques except the Masjid al-Haram, for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) is the last of the Apostles, and his mosque is the last of the mosques. Abu Salama and Abu Abdullah (two of the narrators in this chain of narrations said: We had no doubt that what Abu Haraira (Allah be pleased with him) had said was from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and so we did not like to get an attestation from Abu Huraira about this hadith until Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) died. We discussed it (the issue of getting attestation from Abu Huraira) amongst ourselves and blamed one another as to why we did not talk about it to Abu Huraira regarding it so that he could attribute its transmission to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in case he had heard It from him. While we were discussing it as we sat with 'Abdullah b. Ibrahlm b. Qariz; we made a mention of this hadith, and our omission (in getting its attestation) about its direct transmission by Abu Huraira from him (the Holy Proohet); thereupon Abdullah b. Ibrahim said to us: I bear witness to the fact that I heard Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) say that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I am the last of the Apostles and my mosque is the last of the mosques.
[3212]
Yahya b. Sa'id (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I said to Abu Salih: Did you hear Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) making a mention of the excellence of prayer in the mosque of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? He said: No (I did not hear directly from Abu Huraira), but I heard Abdullah b. Ibrahlm b. Qariz; say that' he had heard from Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) that Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) had said: Prayer in this mosque of mine is better than a thousand prayers. or. is like one thousand prayers observed in other mosques besides It, except that it be in al-Masjid al-Haram. This hadith has been narrated by Yabya b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters.
[3213]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Prayer in this mosque of mine is better than a thousand prayers (observed in other mosque.) besides it, except that of Masjid al-Haram.
[3214]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitters.
[3215]
Ibn 'Umar reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying like this.
[3216]
Ibn Umar narrated from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) a hadlth like this.
[3217]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that a woman fell ill and she said: In case Allah cures me I will certainly go and observe prayer in Bait al-Maqdis. She recovered and so she made preparations to go out (to that place). She came to Maimuna. the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). and after greeting her she informed her about it, whereupon she said: Stay here. and eat the provision (which you had made) and observe prayer In the mosque of the Messenger (may peace be upon him). for I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: Prayer In it is better than a thousand prayers observed in other mosques except the mosque of the Ka'ba.
[3218]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported it directly from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) that he said: Do not undertake journey but to three mosques: this mosque of mine, the Mosque of al-Haram and the Mosque of Aqsa (Bait al-Maqdis).
[3219]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri (but with this change of words) that he (Allah's Apostle) said: "Undertake journey to three mosques."
[3220]
Abu Haraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) as saying: One should undertake journey to three mosques: the mosque of the Ka'ba, my mosque, and the mosque of Elia (Bait al-Maqdis).
[3221]
Abu Salama b. Abd al-Rabman reported: 'Abd al-Rabman b. Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) happened to pass by me and I said to him. How did you hear your father making mention of the mosque founded on Piety? He said: My father said: I went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as he was in the house of one of his wives, and said: Messenger of Allah, which of the two mosques is founded on piety? Thereupon he took a handful of pebbles and threw them on the ground and then said: This is the very mosque of yours (mosque at Medina). He (the narrator) said: I bear witness that I heard your father making mention of it.
[3222]
Abu Sa'id reported from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) a hadlth like this, but in the chain of transmitters no mention was made of Abd al- Rahman b. Abu Sa'id.
[3223]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited (the mosque) at Quba' riding and on foot.
[3224]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to the mosque at Quba' riding and on foot, and he observed two rak'ahs of (Nafl prayer) in it.
[3225]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Quba' riding as well as on foot.
[3226]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) with another chain of transmitters.
[3227]
Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to come to Quba' riding and on foot
[3228]
Ibn 'Umar had narrated this hadith through another chain of transmitters.
[3229]
Ibn Umar used to come to Quba' on every Saturday and he said: I saw Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) coming (to this place) on every Saturday.
[3230]
'Abdullah b. 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to come to Quba', i.e. (he came) on every Saturday, and he used to come riding or on foot. Ibn Dinar (another narrator) said that Ibn Umar used to do like this. This hadlth has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Dinar, but he made no mention of: "Every Saturday."
[3231]
'Alqama reported: While I was walking with 'Abdullah at Mina, 'Uthman happened to meet him.He stopped there and began to talk with him. Uthman said to him: Abu 'Abd al-Rahman, should we not marry you to a young girl who may recall to you some of the past of your bygone days; thereupon he said: If you say so, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: 0 young men, those among you who can support a wife should marry, for it restrains eyes from casting (evil glances). and preserves one from immorality; but those who cannot should devote themselves to fasting for it is a means of controlling sexual desire.
[3232]
'Alqama reported: While I was going along with 'Abdullah b. Ma'sud (Allah he pleased with him) in Mina, 'Uthman b. 'Affan (Allah be pleased with him) happened to meet him and said: Come here, Abu 'Abd al-Rahman (kunya of Abdullah b. Mas'ud), and he isolated him (from me), and when 'Abdullah (b.Mas'ud) saw that there was no need (for this privacy), he said to me: 'Alqama, come on, and so I went there. (Then) 'Uthman said to him: Abu Abd al-Rahman, should we not marry you to a virgin girl that your past may be recalled to your mind?'Abdullah said: If you say so, the rest of the hadith is the same as narrated above.
[3233]
Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to us: 0 young men, those among you who can support a wife should marry, for it restrains eyes (from casting evil glances) and preserves one from immorality; but he who cannot afford It should observe fast for it is a means of controlling the sexual desire.
[3234]
Abu al-Rahman b. Yazid said:I and my uncle 'Alqama and al-Aswad went to 'Abdullah b. Mas'ud (Allah be pleased with him).He (the narrator further) said: I was at that time young, and he narrated a hadith which it seemed he narrated for me that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said like one transmitted by Mu'awiya, and further added: I lost no time in marrying.
[3235]
'Abd al-Rahman b. Yazid reported on the authority of Abdullah: We went to him, and I was the youngest of all (of us), but he did not mention: "I lost no time in marrying."
[3236]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that some of the Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) asked his (the Prophet's) wives about the acts that he performed in private.Someone among them (among his Companions) said: I will not marry women; someone among them said: I will not eat meat; and someone among them said: I will not lie down in bed.He (the Holy Prophet) praised Allah and glorified Him, and said: What has happened to these people that they say so and so, whereas I observe prayer and sleep too; I observe fast and suspend observing them; I marry women also?And he who turns away from my Sunnah, he has no relation with Me
[3237]
Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: The Messengger of Allah (may peace be upon him) rejected (the idea) of Uthman b. Muz'unliving in celibacy (saying): And if he (the Holy Prophet) had given me permission We would have got ourselves castrated.
[3238]
Sa'id b. al-Musayyib reported: I heard Sa'd (b.Abi Waqqas) saying that the idea of 'Uthman b. Maz'un for living in celibacy was rejected (by the Holy Prophet), and if he had been given permission they would have got themselves castrated.
[3239]
Sa'id b. al Musayyib heard Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas (Allah be pleased with him) saying that Uthman b. Maz'un decided to live in celibacy, but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade him to do so, and if he had permitted him, we would have got ourselves castrated.
[3240]
Jabir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw a woman, and so he came to his wife, Zainab, as she was tanning a leather and had sexual intercourse with her.He then went to his Companions and told them: The woman advances and retires in the shape of a devil, so when one of you sees a woman, he should come to his wife, for that will repel what he feels in his heart.
[3241]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saw a woman; and the rest of the hadith was narrated but (with this exception) that he said he came to his wife Zainab, who was tanning a (piece of) leather, and he made no mention of: "She retires in the shape of satan."
[3242]
Jabir heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) say: When a woman fascinates any one of you and she captivates his heart, he should go to his wife and have an intercourse with her, for it would repel what he feels.
[3243]
Abdullah (b. Mas'ud) reported: We were on an expedition with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and we had no women with us.We said: Should we not have ourselves castrated?He (the Holy Prophet) forbade us to do so He then granted us permission that we should contract temporary marriage for a stipulated period giving her a garment, and 'Abdullah then recited this verse: 'Those who believe do not make unlawful the good things which Allah has made lawful for you, and do not transgress.Allah does not like trangressers" (al-Qur'an, v. 87).
[3244]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jarir with the same chain of transmitters and he also recited this (above-mentioned verse) to us, but he did not say that 'Abdullah recited it.
[3245]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Isma'il with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "We were young, so we said: Allah's Messenger, should we not have ourselves castrated?But he (the narrator) did not say; We were on an expedition."
[3246]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah and Salama b. al-Akwa' said: There came to us the proclaimer of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has granted you permission to benefit yourselves, i.e. to contract temporary marriage with women.
[3247]
Salama b. al.Akwa' and Jabir b. Abdullah reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to us and permitted us to contract temporary marriage.
[3248]
Ibn Uraij reported: 'Ati' reported that jibir b. Abdullah came to perform 'Umra, and we came to his abode, and the people asked him about different things, and then they made a mention of temporary marriage, whereupon he said: Yes, we had been benefiting ourselves by this temporary marriage during the lifetime of theHoly Prophet (may peace be upon him) and during the tinie of Abi! Bakr and 'Umar.
[3249]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: We contracted temporary marriage giving a handful of (tales or flour as a dower during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and durnig the time of Abu Bakr until 'Umar forbade it in the case of 'Amr b. Huraith.
[3250]
Abu Nadra reported: While I was in the company of Jabir b. Abdullah, a person came to him and said that Ibn 'Abbas and Ibn Zubair differed on the two types of Mut'as (Tamattu' of Hajj 1846 and Tamattu' with women), whereupon Jabir said: We used to do these two during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).Umar then forbade us to do them, and so we did not revert to them.
[3251]
Iyas b. Salama reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave sanction for contracting temporary marriage for three nights in the year of Autas 1847 and then forbade it.
[3252]
Sabra Juhanni reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) permitted temporary marriage for us.So I and another person went out and saw a woman of Bana 'Amir, who was like a young long-necked she-camel. We presented ourselves to her (for contracting temporary marriage), whereupon she said: What dower would you give me?I said: My cloak.And my companion also said: My cloak. And the cloak of-my companion was superior to my cloak, but I was younger than he. So when she looked at the cloak of my companion she liked it, and when she cast a glance at me I looked more attractive to her.She then said: Well, you and your cloak are sufficient for me.I remained with her for three nights, and then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who has any such woman with whom he had contracted temporary marriage, he should let her off.
[3253]
Rabi' b. Sabra reported that his father went on an expedition with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) during the Victory of Mecca, and we stayed there for fifteen days (i.e. for thirteen full days and a day and a night), and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) permitted us to contract temporary marriage with women.So I and another person of my tribe went out, and I was more handsome than he, whereas he was almost ugly.Each one of us had a cloaks, My cloak was worn out, whereas the cloak of my cousin was quite new. As we reached the lower or the upper side of Mecca, we came across a young woman like a young smart long-necked she-camel.We said: Is it possible that one of us may contract temporary marriage with you? She said: What will you give me as a dower?Each one of us spread his cloak. She began to cast a glance on both the persons. My companion also looked at her when she was casting a glance at her side and he said: This cloak of his is worn out, whereas my cloak is quite new. She, however, said twice or thrice: There is no harm in (accepting) this cloak (the old one). So I contracted temporary marriage with her, and I did not come out (of this) until Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) declared it forbidden.
[3254]
Rabi' b. S'abra al-jahanni reported on the authority of his father.We went with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to Mecca during the year of Victory and he narrated like this a hadith transmitted by Bishr (the previous one) but with this addition: "She said: Can it be possible?" And it is also mentioned in it: "He said: The cloak of this (man) is old and worn out."
[3255]
Sabra al-Juhanni reported on the authority of his father that while he was with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon hm) he said: 0 people, I had permitted you to contract temporary marriage with women, but Allah has forbidden it (now) until the Day of Resurrection.So he who has any (woman with this type of marriage contract) he should let her off, and do not take back anything you have given to then (as dower).
[3256]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abd al-'Aziz b 'Umar with the same chain of transmitters, and he said: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) standing between the pillar and the gate (of the Ka'ba) and he was relating a hadith as narrated by Ibn Numair.
[3257]
'Abd al-Malik b. Rabi' b. Sabraal-Juhanni reported on the authority of his father who narrated it on the authority of his father (i e. 'Abd al-Malik's grandfather, Sabura al-juhanni): Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) permitted us to contract temporary marriage in the Year of Victory, as we entered Mecce, and we did come out of it but he forbade us to do it.
[3258]
Sabra b. Ma'bad reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) permitted his Companions to contract temporary marriage with women in the Year of Victory.So I and a friend of mine from Banu Sulaim went out, until we found a young woman of Banu Amir who was like a young she-camel having a long neck.We made proposal to her for contracting temporary marriage with us, and presented to her our cloaks (as dower).She began to look and found me more handsome than my friend, but found the cloak of my friend more beautiful than my cloak. She thought in her wind for a while, but then preferred me to my friend.So I remained with her for three (nights), and then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded us to part with them (such women).
[3259]
Rabi' b. Sabra reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) prohibited the contracting of temporary marriage.
[3260]
Rabi' b. Sabra reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade on the Day of Victory to contract temporary marriage with women.This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Rabi' b. Sabra that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade to contracf temporary marriage with women at the time of Victory, and that his father had contracted the marriage for two red cloaks.
[3261]
'Urwa b. Zabair reported that 'Abdullah b. Zubair (Allah be pleased with him) stood up (and delivered an address) in Mecca saying: Allah has made blind the hearts of some people as He has deprived them of eyesight that they give religious verdict in favour of temporary marriage, while he was alluding to a person (Ibn 'Abbas). Ibn Abbas called him and said: You are an uncouth person, devoid of sense.By my life, Mut'a was practised during the lifetime of the leader of the pious (he meant Allah's Messenger, may peace be upon him), and Ibn Zubair said to him: just do it yourselves, and by Allah, if you do that I will stone you with your stones.Ibn Shihab said.Khalid b. Muhajir b. Saifullah informed me: While I was sitting in the company of a person, a person came to him and he asked for a religious verdict about Mut'a and he permitted him to do it.Ibn Abu 'Amrah al-Ansari (Allah be pleased with him) said to him: Be gentle.It was permitted in- the early days of Islam, (for one) who was driven to it under the stress of necessity just as (the eating of) carrion and the blood and flesh of swine and then Allah intensified (the commands of) His religion and prohibited it (altogether).Ibn Shihab reported: Rabi' b. Sabra told me that his father (Sabra) said: I contracted temporary marriage with a woman of Banu 'Amir for two cloaks during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him); then he forbade us to do Mut'a.Ibn Shihab said: I heard Rabi' b. Sabra narrating it to Umar b. 'Abd al-'Aziz and I was sitting there.
[3262]
Sabra al-Juhanni reported on the authority of his father: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited the contracting of temporary marriage and said: Behold, it is forbidden from this very day of yours to the Day of Resurrection, and he who has given something (as a dower) should not take it back.
[3263]
'Ali b. AbiTalib reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited on the Day of Khaibar the contracting of temporary marriage with women and the eating of the flesh of domestic asses.
[3264]
Malik narrated this hadith on the authority of the same chain of trans- witters that 'Ali b. Abil Talib said to a person: You are a person led astray; Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade us (to do Mut'a), as is stated In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Yahya b. Malik.
[3265]
Muhammad b. 'Ali narrated on the authority of his father 'Ali that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) on the Day of Khaibar prohibited for ever the contracting of temporary marriage and eating of the flesh of the domestic asses.
[3266]
'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) heard that Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) gave some relaxation in connection with the contracting of temporary marriage, whereupon he said: Don't be hasty (in your religious verdict), Ibn 'Abbas, for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the Day of Khaibar prohibited for ever the doing of it-And eating of the flesh of domestic asses.
[3267]
'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) said to Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the Day of Khaibar forbade forever the contracting of temporary marriage and the eating of the flesh of domestic asses.
[3268]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace upon him) having said this: One should not combine a woman and her father's sister, nor a woman and her mother's sister in marriage.
[3269]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade combining of four women in marriage: a woman with her tather's sister, and a woman with her mother's sister.
[3270]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: Father's sister should not be combined with her brother's daughter, nor the daughter of a sister with her mother's sister.
[3271]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade a person to combine in marriage a womanarid her father's sister, and a woman and her mother's sister.Ibn Shihab said: So we regarded the paternal aunt of her (wife's) father and the maternal aunt of her (wife's) father at the same level.
[3272]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: One should not combine in marriage a woman with her father's sister, or her mother's sister.
[3273]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3274]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: A man must not make proposal of marriage to a woman when his brother has done so already.And he must not offer a price for a thing for which his brother had already offered a price; and a woman must not be combined in marriage with her father's sister, nor with her mother's sister, and a woman must not ask to have her sister divorced in order to deprive her of what belongs to her,but she must marry, because she will have what Allah has decreed for her.
[3275]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the combining of a woman in marriage with her father's sister, or with her mother's sister, or that a woman should ask for divorce for her sister in order to deprive her of what belongs to her.Allah, the Exalted'and Majestic, is her Sustainer too.
[3276]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade to combine a woman and her father's sister, and a woman and her mother's sister.
[3277]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Amr b. Dinar
[3278]
Nubaih b. Wahb reported that 'Umar b. Ubaidullah intended to marry Talha b. 'Umar with the daughter of Shaiba b. Jubair; so he sent a messenger to Aban b. Uthman to attend the marriage, and he was at that time the Amir of Hajj. Aban said: I heard 'Uthman b. 'Affan say that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had stated: A Muhrim must neither marry himself, nor arrange the marriage of another one, nor should he make the proposal of marriage.
[3279]
Nubaih b. Wahb reported: Umar b. Ubaidullah b. Ma'mar sent me to Aban b. Uthman as he wanted to make the proposal of the marriage of his son with the daughter of Shaiba b. Uthman.He (Aban b. Uthman) was at that time (busy) in the season of Pilgrimage.He said: I deem him to be a man of the desert (for it is a common thing) that a Muhrim can neither marry, nor is he allowed to be married to anyone.It is Uthman (b.Affan) who reported this to us from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3280]
Uthman b. 'Affan reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had said: A Muhrim should neither marry himself, nor should he be got married to anyone, nor should he make the proposal of marriage.
[3281]
'Uthman (b.'Affan) reported it directly from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) that he said: A Muhrim should neithermarry (in that state) nor make the proposal of marriage.
[3282]
Nabaih b. Wahb reported that Umar b. 'Ubaidullah b. Ma'mar intended to marry his son Talha with the daughter of Shaiba b. Jubair during the Pilgrimage. Aban b. Uthman was at that time the Amir of Pilgrims.So he ('Umar b. Ubaidullah) sent someone (as a messenger) to Aban saying: I intend to marry Talha b. 'Umar and I earnestly desire you to be present there (in this ceremony of marriage).Aban said to him: I find you a block-headed 'Iraqi. I heard 'Uthman b. 'Affan say that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A Muhrim should not marry.
[3283]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) married Maimulna in the state of Ihram.Ibn Numair made this addition: "I narrated it to Zuhri and he said: Yazid b. al-Asamm (Allah be pleased with him)told me that he (the Holy Prophet) married her when he was not a muhrim."
[3284]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: Allah's Messenger. (may peace be upon him) married Maimuna while he was a Muhrim.
[3285]
Yazid b. al-Asamm reported: Maimuna daughter of al-Harith narrated to me that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) married her and he was not in the state of Ihram.And she (Maimuna) was my mother's sister and that of Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them).
[3286]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as having said this: None amongst you should outbid another in a transaction, nor should he make proposals of marriage upon the proposal made by someone else.
[3287]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as having said this: A person should not enter into a transaction when his brother (had already entered into but not finalised), and he should not make proposal of marriage upon the proposal already made by his brother, until he permits it.
[3288]
A hadith like this has been reported on the authority of Nafi' with the same chain of transmitters.
[3289]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as having forbidden a dweller of the town selling the merchandise of a villager or outbidding in a sale (in order that another might fall into a snare), or a person making the proposal of marriage when his brother has already made such a proposal, or entering into a transaction when his brother has already entered; and a woman asking the divorce of her sister in order to deprive her of what belongs to her. 'Amr made this addition: "The person should not purchase in opposition to his brother."
[3290]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as having said this: Do not outbid in a sale in order to ensnare. No man should enter into a transaction in which his brother has already entered, and no dweller of the town should sell on behalf of the villager.And no man should make a proposal of marriage which his brother has already made and no woman should ask for the divorce of another (co-wife) in order to deprive her of what belongs to her.
[3291]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight alteration.
[3292]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The Muslim should not purchase in opposition to his brother, and he should not make the proposal of marriage on the proposal already made by his brother.
[3293]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3294]
'Uqba b. 'Amir said on the pulpit that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A believer is the brother of a believer, so it is not lawful for a believer to outbid his brother, and he should not propose an engagement when his brother has thus proposed until he gives it up.
[3295]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited Shighar which means that a man gives his daughter in marriage on the condition that the other gives his daughter to him in marriage with- out any dower being paid by either.
[3296]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of "Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) but with a slight variation of words.
[3297]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited Shighar.
[3298]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as having said: There is no Shighar in islam.
[3299]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited Shighar.Ibn Numair added: Shighar means that a person should say to the other person: Give me the hand of your daughter in marriage and I will (in return) marry my daughter to you; or merry me your sister, and I will marry my sister to you.
[3300]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Vmar with the same chain of transmitters, but there is no mention of Ibn Numair.
[3301]
Jabir b. Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited Shighar.
[3302]
'Uqba b. Amir (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The most worthy condition which must be fulfilled is that which makes sexual intercourse lawful.In the narration transmitted by Ibn Muthanna (instead of the word "condition") it is "conditions".
[3303]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as having said: A woman without a husband (or divorced or a widow) must not be married until she is consulted, and a virgin must not be married until her permission is sought.They asked the Prophet of Allah (may peace be upon him): How her (virgin's) consent can be solicited ? He (the Holy Prophet) said: That she keeps silence.
[3304]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[3305]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about a virgin whose marriage is solemnised by her guardian, whether it was necessary or not to consult her.Allah's Messerger (may peace be upon him) said : Yes, she must be consulted.'A'isha reported: I told him that she feels shy, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Her silence implies her consent.
[3306]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: A woman without a husband has wore right to her person than her guardian, and a virgin's consent must be asked from her, and her silence implies her consent.
[3307]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A woman who has been previously married (Thayyib) has more right to her person than her guardian.And a virgin should also be consulted, and her silence implies her consent.
[3308]
Sufyan reported on the basis of the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): A woman who has been previously married (Thayyib) has more right to her person than her guardian; and a virgin's father must ask her consent from her, her consent being her silence, At times he said: Her silence is her affirmation.
[3309]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) married me when I was six years old, and I was admitted to his house at the age of nine.She further said: We went to Medina and I had an attack of fever for a month, and my hair had come down to the earlobes.Umm Ruman (my mother) came to me and I was at that time on a swing along with my playmates. She called me loudly and I went to her and I did not know what she had wanted of me.She took hold of my hand and took me to the door, and I was saying: Ha, ha (as if I was gasping), until the agitation of my heart was over.She took me to a house, where had gathered the women of the Ansar.They all blessed me and wished me good luck and said: May you have share in good.She (my mother) entrusted me to them.They washed my head and embellished me and nothing frightened me.Allah's Messenger (,may peace be upon him) came there in the morning, and I was entrusted to him.
[3310]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) married me when I was six years old, and I was admitted to his house when I was nine years old.
[3311]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) married her when she was seven years old, and he was taken to his house as a bride when she was nine, and her dolls were with her; and when he (the Holy Prophet) died she was eighteen years old.
[3312]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) contracted marriage with me in Shawwal and took me to his house as a bride during Shawwal.And who among the wives of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was dearer to him than I, and' A'isha liked that the women (of her family) should enter the houses as brides during the month of Shawwal.
[3313]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sufyan with the same chain of transmitters, but he made no mention of the act of 'A'isha (being admitted as a wife in the house of the Holy Prophet).
[3314]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I was in the company of Allah's Messenger (way peace be upan him) when there came a man and informed him that he had contracted to marry a woman of the Ansar.Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Did you cast a glance at her?He said: No. He said: Go and cast a glance at her, for there is something in the eyes of the Ansar.
[3315]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: A man came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: I have contracted marriage with a woman of the Ansar, whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Did you cast a glance at her, for there is something in the eyes of the Ansar?He said: I did cast a glance at her, whereupon he said: For what (dower) did you marry her?He said: For four 'uqiyas.Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: For four 'uqiyas; it seems as if you dig out silver from the side of this mountain (and that is why you are prepared to pay such a large amount of dower).We have nothing which we should give you.There is a possibility that we may send you to an (expedition) where you may get (booty).So he sent that man (in the expedition) which was despatched to Banu 'Abs.
[3316]
Sahl b. Sa'd al-Sa'idi (Allah be pleased with him) reported: A woman came to Allah's Messenger.(may peace be upon him) and said: Messerbger of Allah, I have come to you to entrust myself to you(you may contract my marriage with anyone at your discretion). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw her and cast a glance at her from head to foot.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) then lowered his head.When the woman saw that he had made no decision in regard to her, she sat down.There stood up a person from amongst his companions and said: Messenger of Allah, marry her to me if you have no need of her.He (the Holy Prophet) said: is there anything with you (which you con give as a dower) ? He said: No, Messenger of Allah, by Allah I have nothing.Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Go to your people (family) and see if you can find something.He returned and said: I have found nothing.The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: See even if it is an Iron ring.He went and returned and said : No, by God, not even an iron ring, but only this lower garment of mine (Sahl said that he had no upper garment), half of which (I am prepared to part with) for her.Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: How can your lower garment serve your purpose, for it you wear it, she would not be able to make any use of it and if she wears it there would not be anything on you ? The man sat down and as the sitting prolonged he stood up (in disappointment) and as he was going back Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded (him) to be called back, and as he came, he said to him: Do you know any part of the Qur'an?He said: I know such and such surahs (and he counted them). whereupon he said: Can you recite them from heart (from your memory)? He said: Yes, whereupon he (Allah's Messenger) said: Go, I have given her to you in marriage for the part of the Qur'an which you know.
[3317]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sahl b. Sa'd with a minor alteration of words, but the hadith transmitted through Za'idah (the words are that the Holy Prophet) said : Go, I have married her to you, and you teach her something of the Qur'an.
[3318]
Abu Salama b. 'Abd al-Rahman reported: I asked 'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): What is the amount of dower of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)?She said: It was twelve 'uqiyas and one nash. She said: Do you know what is al-nash?I said: No. She said: It is half of uqiya, and it amounts to five hundred dirhams, and that was the dower given by Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to his wives.
[3319]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saw the trace of yellowness on 'Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf and said: What is this? Thereupon he said: Allah's Messenger, I have married a woman for a date-stone's weight of gold.He said: God bless you ! Hold a wedding feast, even if only with a sheep.
[3320]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be plca3ed with him) reported that 'Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf (Allah be pleased with him) married during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for a nawat weight of gold and the messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to him: Give a feast even with a sheep.
[3321]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported that 'Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf (Allah be pleased with him) married a woman for a date-stone's weight of gold and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to him: Hold a wedding feast, even if only with a sheep.
[3322]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Humaid with the same chain of transmitters except (with this minor alteration of words) that 'Abd al-Rahman said: "I married a woman."
[3323]
Abd al-Rahman b. 'Auf (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saw the signs of the happiness of wedding in me, and I said: I have married a woman of the Ansar.He said: How much Mahr have you paid? I said: For a date-stone weight of gold.And in the hadith transmitted by Ishaq (it is): (nawat weight) of gold.
[3324]
Anas b. Malik reported that 'Abd al-Rahman married a woman for a datestone weight of gold.Shu'ba has narrattd this hadith with the same chain of transmitters except for (this alteration) that he said that a person from among the sons of 'Abd al Rahman said: "from gold".
[3325]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) set out on an expedition to Khaibar and we observed our morning prayer in early hours of the dawn.The Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) then mounted and so did Abu Talha ride, and I was seating myself behind Abu Talha.Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) moved in the narrow street of Khaibar (and we rode so close to each other in the street) that my knee touched the leg of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). (A part of the) lower garment of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) slipped from his leg and I could see the whiteness of the leg of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).As he entered the habitation he called: Allah-o-Akbar (Allah is the Greatest).Khaibar is ruined.And when we get down in the valley of a people evil is the morning of the warned ones.He repeated it thrice.In the meanwhile the people went out for their work, and said: By Allah, Muhammad (has come).Abd al-'Aziz or some of our com- panions said: Muhammad and the army (have come).He said: We took it (the territory of Khaibar) by force, and there were gathered the prisoners of war.There came Dihya and he said: Messenger of Allah, bestow upon me a girl ont of the prisones. He said: Go and get any girl.He made a choice for Safiyya daughter of Huyayy (b. Akhtab).There came a person to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Apostle of Allah, you have bestowed Safiyya bint Huyayy, the chief of Quraiza and al-Nadir, upon Dihya and she is worthy of you only.He said: Call him along with her.So he came along with her.When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saw her he said: Take any other woman from among the prisoners.He (the narrator) said: He (the Holy Prophet) then granted her emancipation and married her.Thabit said to him: Abu Hamza, how much dower did he (the Holy Prophet) give to her?He said: He granted her freedom and then married her.On the way Umm Sulaim embellished her and then sent her to him (the Holy Prophet) at night.Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) appeared as a bridegroom in the morning.He (the Holy Prophet) said: He who has anything (to eat) should bring that.Then the cloth was spread.A person came with cheese, another came with dates, and still another came with refined butter, and they prepared hais and that was the wedding feast of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)
[3326]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters on the authority of Anas that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) emancipated Safiyya, and her emancipation was treated as her wedding gift, and in the hadith transmitted by Mu'adh on the authority of his father (the words are): "He (the Holy Prophet) married Safiyya and bestowed her emancipation as her wedding gift."
[3327]
Abu Musa reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said about one who emancipated a slave woman, and then married her, that for him there are two rewards.
[3328]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I was sitting behind Abu Talha on the Day of Khaibar and my feet touched the foot of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and we came (to the people of Khaibar) when the sun had risen and they had driven out their cattle, and had themselves come out with their axes, large baskets and hatchets, and they said: (Here come) Muhammad and the army. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Khaibar is ruined.Verily when we get down in the valley of a people, evil is the morning of the warned ones (al-Qur'an, xxxvii. 177).Allah, the Majestic and the Glorious, defeated them (the inhabitants of Khaibar), and there fell to the lot of Dihya a beautiful girl, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) got her in exchange of seven heads, and then entrusted her to Umm Sulaim so that she might embellish her and prepare her (for marriage) with him. He (the narrator) said: He had been under the impression that he had said that so that she might spend her period of 'Iddah in her (Umm Sulaim's) house. (The woman) was Safiyya daughter of Huyayy.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) arranged the wedding feast consisting of dates, cheese, and refined butter, and pits were dug and tiers were set in them dining cloths, and there was brought cheese and refined butter, and these were placed there.And the people ate to their fill, and they said: We do not know whether he (the Holy Prophet) had married her (as a free woman), or as a slave woman.They said: If he (the Holy Prophet) would make her wear the veil, then she would be a (free married) woman, and if he would not make her wear the veil, then she should be a slave woman.When he intended to ride, he made her wear the veil and she sat on the hind part of the camel; so they came to know that he had married her.As they approached Medina, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) drove (his ride) quickly and so we did.'Adba' (the name of Allah's Apostle's camel) stumbled and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) fell down and she (Radrat Safiyya: also fell down.He (the Holy Prophet) stood up and covered her. woman looked towards her and said: May Allah keep away the Jewess! He (the narrator) said: I said: Aba Hamza, did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) really fall down? He said: Yes, by Allah, he in fact fell down.Anas said: I also saw the wedding feast of Zainab, and he (the Holy Prophet) served bread and meat to the people, and made them eat to their heart's content, and he (the Holy Prophet) sent me to call people, and as he was free (from the ceremony) he stood up and I followed him.Two persons were left and they were busy in talking and did not get out (of the apartment).He (the Holy Prophet) then proceeded towards (the apartments of) his wives.He greeted with as-Salamu 'alaikum to every one of them and said: Members of the household, how are you? They said: Messenger of Allah, we are in good state 'How do you find your family?He would say: In good state.When he was free from (this work of exchanging greetings) he came back, and I also came back along with him.And as he reached the door, (he found) that the two men were still busy in talking.And when they saw him having returned, they stood up and went out; and by Allah ! I do not know whether I had informed him, or there was a revelation to him (to the affect) that they had gone. He (the Holy Prophet) then came back and I also returned along with him, and as he put his step on the threshold of his door he hung a curtain between me and him, and (it was on this occasion) that Allah revealed this verse: ("O you who believe), do not enter the houses of the Prophet unless permission is given to 'you" (xxxiii. 53).
[3329]
Anas,(Allah be pleased with him) reported: Safiyya (Allah be pleased with her) fell to the lot of Dihya in the spoils of war, and they praised her in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: We have not seen the like of her among the captives of war.He sent (a messenger) to Dihya and he gave him whatever he demanded. He then sent her to my mother and asked her to embellish her.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) then got out of Khaibar until when he was on the other side of it, he halted, and a tent was pitched for him. When it was morning Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who has surplus of provision with him should bring that to us.Some persons would bring the surplus of dates, and the other surplus of mush of barley until there became a heap of bals.They began to eat the hais and began to drink out of the pond which had the water of rainfall in it and which was situated by their side.Anas said that that constituted the wedding feast of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).He (further) said: We proceeded until we saw the walls of Medina, and we were delighted.We made our mounts run quickly and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) also made his mount run quickly.And Safiyya (Allah be pleased with her) was at his back, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had seated her behind him.The camel of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stumbled and he (the Holy Prophet) fell down and she also fell down.And none among the people was seeing him and her, until Allah's Messeuger (may peace be upon him) stood up and he covered her, and we came to him and he said: We have received no injury.We entered Medina and there came out the young ladies of the household.They saw her (hadrat Safiyya) and blamed her for falling down.
[3330]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: When the 'Iddah of Zainab was over, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to Zaid to make a mention to her about him. Zaid went on until he came to her and she was fermenting her flour. He (Zaid) said: As I saw her I felt in my heart an idea of her greatness so much so that I could not see towards her (simply for the fact) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had made a mention of her. So I turned my back towards her. and I turned upon my heels, and said: Zainab, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has sent (me) with a message to you.She said: I do not do anything until I solicit the will of my Lord.So she stood at her place of worship and the (verse of) the Qur'an (pertaining to her marriage) were revealed, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to her without permission.He (the narrator) said: I saw that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) served us bread and meat until it was broad day light and the people went away, but some persons who were busy in con- versation stayed on in the house after the meal.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) also went out and I also followed him, and he began to visit the apartments of his wives greeting them (with the words): As-Salamu 'alaikum, and they would say: Allah's Messenger, how did you find your family (hadrat Zainab) ? He (the narrator) stated: I do not know whether I had informed him that the people had gone out or he (the Holy Prophet) informed me (about that).He moved on until he entered the apartment, and I also went and wanted to enter (the apartment) along with him, but he threw a curtain between me and him, as (the verfes pertaining to seclusion) had been revealed, and people were instructed in what they had been instructed.Ibn Rafii had made this addition in his narration : "O you who believe, enter not the houses of the Prophet unless permission is given to you for a meal, not waiting for its cooking being finished ... " to the words ". . . Allah forbears not from the truth."
[3331]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I did not see Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) giving a wedding feast (on the marriage) of any one (of his wives) as he did in the case of (his marriage with) Zainab, for then he sacrificed a goat (on this occasion).
[3332]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave no better wedding feast than the one he did (on the occasion of his marriage with) Zainab.Thabit al-Bunani (one of the narrators) said: What did he serve in the wedding feast?He (Anas) said: He fed them bread and meat (so lavishly) that they (the guests) abandoned it (of their own accord after having taken them to their hearts' content).
[3333]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported: When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) married Zainab bint jahsh, he invited people (to the wedding feast) and they ate food. They then sat there and entered into conversation. He (the Holy Prophet) made a stir as if he was preparing to stand up, but (the persons busy in talking) did not stand up.When he (the Holy Prophet) saw it, he stood up and when he did so, some other persons stood up.'Asim and Abd al-A'la in their narrations made this addition: Three (persons) sat there, and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came there to enter (the apartment) but he found the people sitting there.Then they stood up and went away.He said: Then I came and informed Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) that they had gone away.He (the Holy Prophet) then came there until he entered (the apartment).I also went and was about to enter, when he hung a curtain between me and him (and it was on this occasion that) Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, revealed this verse: "O you who believe, enter not the houses of the Prophet unless permission is given to you for a meal, not waiting for its cooking being finished to the (words) "Surely this is serious in the sight of Allah" (xxxiii. 53).
[3334]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I was the best informed among the people pertaining to Hijab (veil and seclusion).Ubayy b. Ka'b used to ask me about it.Anas (Allah be pleased with him) thus narrated: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) got up in the morning as a bridegroom of Zainab bint jahsh (Allah be pleased witt her) as he had married her at Medina.He invited people to the wedding feast after the day had well risen.There sat Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and there kept sitting along with him some persons after the people had stood up (for departure); then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up and walked on and I also walked along with him until he reached the door of the apartment of 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her).He then thought that they (those who had been sitting there after meal) had gone away.So he returned and I also returned with him, but they were still sitting at their places. So he returned for the second time and I also returned until he reached the apartment of 'A'isha. He again returned and I also returned and they had (by that time) stood up, and he hung a curtain between me and him (at the door of the apartment of Hadrat Zainab, where he had to stay), and Allah revealed the verse pertaining to veil.
[3335]
Anas b. Malik (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) contracted marriage and he went to his wife.My mother Umm Sulaim prepared hais and placed it in an earthen vessel and said: Anas, take it to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and say: My mother has sent that to you and she offers greetings to you, and says that it is a humble gift for you on our behalf, Messenger of Allah.So I went along with it to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: My mother offers you salutations, and says that it is a humble gift for you on our behalf.He said: Place it here, and then said: Go and invite on my behalf so and so and anyone whom you meet, and he even named some persons. He (Anas) said: I invited whom he had named and whom I met.I (one of the narrators) said: I said to Anas: How many (persons) were there?He (Anas) said: They were about three hundred persons.Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (said to me): Anas, bring that earthen vessel.They (the guests) then began to enter until the courtyard and the apartment were fully packed.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Make a circle of ten (guests), and every person should eat from that nearest to him.They began to eat, until they ate to their fill.A group went out (after eating the food), and another group came in until all of them had eaten.He (the Holy Prophet) said to me: Anas, lift it (the earthen vessel), so I lifted it, but I could not assess whether it had more (food) when I placed it (before Allah's Messenger) or when I lifted it (after the people had been served out of it).A group among them (the guests) began to talk in the house of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was sitting and his wife had been sitting with her face turned towards the wall.It was troublesome for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), so Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went out and greeted his wives.He then returned.When they (the guests) saw that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had returned they thought that it (their overstay) was something troublesome for him.He (the narrator) said: They hastened towards the door and all of them went out.And there came Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he hung a curtain and went in, and I was sitting in his apartment and he did not stay but for a short while.He then came to me and these verses were revealed.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came out and recited them to the people: "O you who believe, enter not the houses of the Prophet unless permission is given to you for a meal, not waiting for its cooking being finished-but when you are invited, enter, and when you have taken food, disperse not seeking to listen to talk.Surely this gives the Prophet trouble" , to the end of verse (xxxiii. 53). (Al-Ja'd said that Anas [b.Malik] stated: I am the first amongst the people to hear these verses), and henceforth the wives of the Apostle (may peace be upon him) began to observe seclusion (al-hijab).
[3336]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported: When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) contracted marriage with Zainab (Allah be pleased with bet), Umm Sulaim sent him hats in a vessel of stone as a gift.Anas stated that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Go and invite on my behalf all the Muslims whom you meet.So I invited on his behalf everyone whom I met.They entered (his house) and they ate and went out.And Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had kept his hand on the food, and he invoked blessing on that, and said whatever Allah wished him to say, and none whom I met was left uninvited.They ate to their fill and went out, but a group among them remained there and was engaged in lengthy discussion. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) felt shy of saying them anything.So he went out and left them in his house and Allah the Great and Majestic revealed this verse: "0 you who believe, enter not the houses of the Prophet unless permission is given to you for a meal, not waiting for its cooking being finished." Qatada (instead of using the word Ghaira Nazirina) used the word Ghaira Mutahayyinina (i.e. not waiting for the time of the food). But when you are invited, enter..."up to this verse. This is purer for your hearts and their hearts.
[3337]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: When any one of you is invited to a feast, he should attend it.
[3338]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you is invited to a feast, he should accept.'Ubaidallah took this feast to be a wedding feast.
[3339]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased withthem) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having said this: When any one of you is invited to a wedding feast, he should accept that.
[3340]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may be upon him) having said this: Accept the feast, when you are invited.
[3341]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: When any one of you invites his brother, he (the latter) should accept his wedding feast, or any other like it.
[3342]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleated with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said : He who is invited to a wedding feast or like it, he should accept it.
[3343]
"Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messen- ger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Come to the feast, when you are invited.
[3344]
Nafil reported: I heard Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them) narrating that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Accept the feast when you are invited to it.And Abdullah (b.Umar) used to come to the feast, whether it was a wedding feast or other than that, and he would come there even in the state of fasting.
[3345]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having said: When you are invited to a feast (even though it is) the leg of the sheep, you should accept it.
[3346]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) said: When any one of you is invited to a feast, he should accept it. He may eat if he likes, or he may abandon (eating) if he likes.Ibn Mathanni did not make mention of the word "feast".
[3347]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abd Zubair with the same chain of transmitters.
[3348]
Abu Haraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If any one of you is invited, he should accept (the invitation).In case he is fasting, he should pray (in order to bless the inmates of the house), and if he is not fasting he should eat.
[3349]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) used to say: The worst kind of food is the wedding feast to which the rich are invited and the poor are ignored.He who does not come to the feast, he in fact disobeys Allah and His Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3350]
Sufyan reported: I said to Zuhri: Abu Bakr, what does this hadith mean: "The worst kind of food is at a wedding feast of the rich"?He laughed and said: The food served in the feast given by the rich is not worst (in itself).Sufyan said: My father was rich, so I felt disturbed when I heard this hadith, so I asked Zuhri who said: I heard from 'Abd al-Rahman al-Alraj that he heard Abu Huraira (Allah he pleased with him) say: The worst kind of food is that served at the wedding feast. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[3351]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3352]
A hadith like this has been narrated by Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters.
[3353]
Abu Haraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying.The worst kind of food is at the wedding feast from which one who comes is turned away, and he who refuses it is invited, and he who did not accept the invitation disobeyed Allah and His Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3354]
'A'isha (Allah he pleased with her) reported: There came the wife of Rifa'a to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: I was married to Rifa'a but he divorced me, making may divorce irrevocable.Afterwards I married Abd al-Rahman b. al-Zubair, but all he possesses is like the fringe of a garment (i.e. he is sexually weak).Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled, and said: Do you wish to return to Rifa'a. (You) cannot (do it) until you have tasted his sweetness and he ('Abd al-Rahman) has tasted your sweetness.Abu Bakr was at that time near him (the Holy Prophet) and Khalid (b. Sa'id) was at the door waiting for the permission to be granted to him to enter), He (Khalid) said; Abu Bakr, do you hear what she is saying loudly in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)?
[3355]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her), the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that Rifa'a al-Quraid (Allah be pleased with him) divorced his wife, making her divorce irrevocable.Afterwards she married Abd at-Rahman b. al-Zubair (Allah be pleased with him), She came to Allah'sApostle (may peace be upon him and said to Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) that she had been the wife of Rifa'a (Allah be pleased with him) and he had divorced her by three pronouncements and afterwards she married 'Abd al-Rahman b. al-Zubair.By Allah, all he possesses is like the fringe of a garment, and she took hold of the fringe of her garment.Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) laughed and said: Perhaps you wish to return to Rifa'a, (but you) cannot (do it) until he has tasted your sweetness and you have tasted his sweetness.Abu Bakr al-siddiq (Allah be pleased with him) was sitting at that time with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and Khalid b. Sa'id b. al-'As (Allah be pleased with him) was sitting at the door of his apartment and he was not permitted to (enter the room), and Kbalid called loudly saying: Abu Bakr, why don't you scold her for what she is saying loudly in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)?
[3356]
'A'isha (Allah bjpl'eased with her) reported that Rifa'a al Qurazi divorced his wife and afterwards Abd al-Rahman b. al-Zubair married her.She came to Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, Rifa'a has divorced me by three pronouncements. (The rest of the hadith is the same.)
[3357]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked about a woman whom a man married and then divorced her, and then she married (another) person, and she was divorced before sexual intercourse with her, whether it was lawful for her first husband (to marry her in this state).He (the Holy Prophet) said: No, until he has tasted her sweetness.
[3358]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[3359]
'A'Asha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: A person divorced his wife by three pronouncements; then another person married her and he also divorced her without having sexual intercourse with her.Then the first husband of her intended to remarry her.It was about such a case that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked, whereupon he said: No, until the second one has tasted her sweetness as the first one had tasted.
[3360]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the same chain of transmitters by 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her).
[3361]
Ibn "Abbas (Allah be pleased with thern) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If anyone amongst you intends to go to his wife he should say: In the name of Allah, 0 Allah protect us against Satan and keep away the Satan from the one that you have bestowed upon us, and if He has ordained a male child for them, Satan will never be able to do any harm to him.
[3362]
This hadith is narrated through another chain of transmitters and there is no mention of (the words) "Bismillah" (In the name of Allah) in it.
[3363]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) declared that the Jews used to say: When a man has intercourse with his wife through the vagina but being on her back. the child will have squint, so the verse came down: "Your wives are your tilth; go then unto your tilth as you may desire"(ii. 223)
[3364]
Jabir (b.Abdullah) (Allah be pleased with him) reported that the Jews used to say that when one comes to one's wife through the vagina, but being on her back, and she becomes pregnant, the child has a squint. So the verse came down: "Your wives are your ti'Ith; go then unto your tilth, as you may desire."
[3365]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Jabir through another chain of transmitters, but in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Zuhri there is an addition (of these words): "If he likes he may (have intercourse) being on the back or in front of her, but it should be through one opening (vagina)."
[3366]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: When a woman spends the night away from the bed of her husband, the angels curse her until morning.This hadith has been narrated through the same chain of transmitters (with a slight variation): "He said: Until she comes back."
[3367]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, when a man calls his wife to his bed, and she does not respond, the One Who is in the heaven is displeased with her until he (her husband) is pleased with her.
[3368]
Abu Huraira (Allah he pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may, peace be upon him) as saying: When a man invites his wife to his bed and she does not come, and he (the husband) spends the sight being angry with her, the angels curse her until morning.
[3369]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah he pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upoin him)said : The most wicked among the people in the eye of Allah on the Day of judgment is the men who goes to his wife and she comes to him, and then he divulges her secret.
[3370]
Abu Sirma al-Khudri (Allah he pleased with him ) reported Allah's Messen- ger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The most important of the trusts in the sight of Allah on the Day of judgment is that a man goes to his wife and she goes to him (and the breach of this trust is) that he should divulge her secret Ibn Numair narrates this hadith with a slight change of wording.
[3371]
Abu Sirma said to Abu Sa'id al Khadri (Allah he pleased with him): 0 Abu Sa'id, did you hear Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) mentioning al-'azl ?He said: Yes, and added: We went out with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the expedition to the Bi'l-Mustaliq and took captive some excellent Arab women; and we desired them, for we were suffering from the absence of our wives, (but at the same time) we also desired ransom for them.So we decided to have sexual intercourse with them but by observing 'azl (Withdrawing the male sexual organ before emission of semen to avoid-conception).But we said: We are doing an act whereas Allah's Messenger is amongst us; why not ask him?So we asked Allah's Mes- senger (may peace be upon him), and he said: It does not matter if you do not do it, for every soul that is to be born up to the Day of Resurrection will be born.
[3372]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Habban with the same chain of transmitters (but with this alteration) that he said: "Allah has ordained whom he has to createuntil the Day of judgment."
[3373]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We took women captives, and we wanted to do 'azl with them.We then asked Allah's Messen- ger (may peace be upon him) about it, and he said to us: Verily you do it, verily you do it, verily you do it, but the soul which has to be born until the Day of judg- ment must be born.
[3374]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) (was asked if he had heard it himself), to which he said: Yes. (I heard) Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is no harm if you do not practise it, for it (the birth of the child) is something ordained (by Allah).
[3375]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Abu Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation (of words).
[3376]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was asked about 'azl, whereupon he said: There is no harm if you do not do that, for it (the birth of the child) is something ordained. Muhammad (one of the narrators) said: (The words) La 'alaykum (there is no harm) implies its Prohibition.
[3377]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported that mention was made of 'azl in the presence of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) whereupon he said: Why do you practise it?They said: There is a man whose wife has to suckle the child, and if that person has a sexual intercourse with her (she may conceive) which he does not like, and there is another person who has a slave-girl and he has a sexual intercourse with her, but he does not like her to have conception so that she may not become Umm Walad, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: There is no harm if you do not do that, for that (the birth of the child) is something pre- ordained.Ibn 'Aun said: I made a mention of this hadith to Hasan, and he said: By Allah, (it seems) as if there is upbraiding in it (for 'azl).
[3378]
Ibn 'Aun reported: I reported to Muhammad on the authority of Ibrahim the hadith reported by 'Abd al-Rahmann b. Bishr (the hadith concerning 'azl), where- upon he said: That (hadith) Abd al-Rahman b. Bishr had narrated to me (also).
[3379]
Ma'bad b. Sirin said to Abu Sa'id (Allah be pleased with him): Did you hear Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) making a mention of something in regard to al-'azl? Thereupon he said: Yes.The rest (of the hadith is the same)
[3380]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Mention was made about al-'azl in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: Why any one of you practises it ? (He did not say: One of you should not do it), for there is no created soul, whose creator is not Allah.
[3381]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked about 'azl, whereupon he said: The child does not come from all the liquid (sermen) and when Allah intends to create anything nothing can prevent it (from coming into existence).
[3382]
A hadith like this has been transmitted by Abu Sa'id from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[3383]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported that a man came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: I have a slave-girl who is our servant and she carries water for us and I have intercourse with her, but I do not want her to conceive.He said: Practise 'azl, if you so like, but what is decreed for her will come to her.The person stayed back (for some time) and then came and said: The girl has become pregnant, whereupon he said: I told you what was decreed for her would come to her.
[3384]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported that a person asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying: I have a slave-girl and I practise 'azl with her, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: This cannot prevent that which Allah has decreed.The person then came (after some time) and said: Messenger of Allah, the slave-girl about whom I talked to you has conceived, whereupon Allah's Messeuger (may peace be upon him) said: I am the servant of Allah and His Messenger.
[3385]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: A person came to Allah's Apostle (the rest of the hadith is the same).
[3386]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We used to practise 'azl while the Qur'an was revealed (during the days when the Holy Prophet was alive).
[3387]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We used to practise 'azl during the life of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[3388]
Jabir (Allah be pleased with him) reported: We used to practise 'azl during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).This (the news of this practise) reached Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and he did not forbid us.
[3389]
Abu Darda' (Allah be pleased with him) related from the Prophet of Allah (may peace be upon him) that he came upon a woman who was in the advanced stage of pregnancy at the door of a tent.He (the Holy Prophet) said: Perhaps he (the man accompanying her) intends to cohabit with her.They said: Yes.Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I have decided to curse him with such a curse as may go along with him to his grave.How can he own him (the child to be born) and that is not lawful for him, and how can he take him as a servant for that is not lawful for him?
[3390]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba.
[3391]
Judaima daughter of Wahb al-Asadiyya (Allah be pleased with her) reported that she heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) assaying: I intended to prohibit cohabitation with a suckling woman until I considered that the Romans and the Persians do it without any injury being caused to their children thereby. (Imam Muslim said: Khalaf reported it from Judamat al-'Asadiyya, but the correct wording is what has been stated by Yahya.)
[3392]
Judama daughter of Wahb, sister of Ukkasha (Allah be pleased with her). reported: I went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) along with some persons and he was saying: I intended to prohibit cohabitation with the suckling women, but I considered the Greeks and Persians, and saw that they suckle their children and this thing (cohabitation) does not do any harm to them (to the suckling women).Then they asked him about 'azl, whereupon he said.That is the secret (way of) burying alive, and Ubaidullah has made this addition in the hadith transmitted by al-Muqri and that is: "When the one buried alive is asked."
[3393]
Judama bint Wahb al-Asadiyya (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying this. The rest of the hadith is the same concerning 'azl and ghila (cohabitating with a suckling woman), but with a slight variation of words.
[3394]
Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: I do 'azi with my wife. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Why do you do that? The person said: I fear harm to her child or her children.Thereupon Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) said:If that were harmful it would harm the Persians and the Greeks.
[3395]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported tha Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was with her and she heard the voice of a person seeking permission to enter the house of Hafsa.'A'isha (Allah he pleased with her) said: Allah's Messenger, he is the person who seeks permission to enter your house, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I think he is so and so (uncle of Hafsa by reason of fosterage).'A'isha said : Messenger of Allah, if so and so (her uncle by reason of fosterage) were alive, could he enter my house?Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Yes.Fosterage makes unlawful what consanguinity makes unlawful.
[3396]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Fosterage makes unlawful what consanguinity makes unlawful.
[3397]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Aflah, the brother of Abu'l-Qu'ais, who was her uncle by reason of fosterage, came, and asked her permission (to enter the house) after seclusicin was instituted.I refused to admit him. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came, I Informed him what I had done.He commanded me to grant him permission (as the brother of her foster-father was also her uncle).
[3398]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: There came to me Aflah b. Abu Qulais, my uncle by reason of fosterage; the rest of the hadith is the same (but with this) addition: "I ('A'isha) said (to the Holy Prophet): It was the woman who suckled me and not the man, whereupon he (Allah's Messenger) said: May your hands or your right hand be besmeared with dust (you were mistaken)."
[3399]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that there came Aflah the brother, of Abu'l-Qu'ais, who sought her permission (to enter) after seclusion was instituted, and AbuQu'ais was the father of 'A'isha by reason of fosterage.'A'isha said: By Allah, I would not permit Aflah unless I have solicited the opinion of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for Abu Qulais has not suckled me, but his wife has given me suck. 'A'isha'(Allah be pleased with her) said: When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) entered, I said: Allah's Messenger, Aflah is the brother of Abu'l-Qulais; he came to me to seek my permission for entering (the houst).I did not like the idea of granting him permission until I had solicited your opinion.Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Grant him permission.'Urwa said it was on account of this that 'A'isha used to say.What is unlawful by reason of consanguinity is unlawful by reason of fosterage.
[3400]
This ha0dith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters (that 'A'isha said): There came Aflah, the brother of Abu'l Qulais (Allah be pleased with him), and sought permission from her,the rest of the hadith is the same (except for the words that the Holy Prophet) said: "He is your uncle.Let your hand be besmeared with dust.Abu'l Qulais was the husband of the woman who had suckled 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her).
[3401]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: My foster uncle came to me and sought permission (to enter the house), but I refused him permission until I had solicited the opinion of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came, I said to him: My foster-uncle sought my permission to (enter the house), but I did not permit him, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: You better admit your uncle (into the house). I ('A'isha) said: It was the woman who suckled me and not the man. (But he) said: He is your uncle, admit him.
[3402]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "The brother of Abu'l-Qu'ais sought permission from her ('A'isha) (to enter the house).The rest is the same.
[3403]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of words.
[3404]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: My foster-uncle Abu'l Ja'd (kunya of Aflah) sought permission from me, which I refused. (Hisham said to me that Abu'l-Ja'd was in fact Abu'l-Qu'ais).When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came, I ('A'isha) informed him about it.He said: Why did you not permit him?Let your right hand or hand be besmeared with dust.
[3405]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that her foster-uncle whose name was Aflah sought permission from her (to enter the house) but she observed seclusion from him, and informed Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) who said to her: Don't observe veil from him for he is Mahram (one with whom marriage cannot be contracted) on account of fosterage as one is Mahram on account of consanguinity.
[3406]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Aflah b. Qu'ais sought permission from me (to enter the house), but I refused to grant him the permission, and he sent me (the message saying): I am your uncle (in the sense) that the wife of my brother has suckled you, (but still) I refused to grant him permission.There came the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and I made a mention of it to him, and he said: He can enter (your house), for he is your uncle.
[3407]
'Ali (Allah be pleased with him) reported having said this : Messenger of Allah, why is it that you select (your wife) from among the Quraish, but you ignore us (the nearest of the kin)?Thereupon he said: Have you anything for me (a suitable match for me)? I said; Yes, the daughter of Hamza, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: She is not lawful for me, for she is the daughter of my brother by reason of fosterage.
[3408]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with the same chain of transmitters.
[3409]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: It was proposed that he (the Holy Prophet) be married to the daughter of Hamza, whereupon he said: She is not lawful for me for she is the daughter of my foster-brother, and that is unlawful by reason of fosterage what is unlawful by reason of genealogy.
[3410]
A hadith like this is narrated on the authority of Hammam, Sa'id, Bishr b 'Umar, but with a small variation of words.
[3411]
Umm Salama (Allah be pleased with her), the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), said: It was said to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him): Is not the daughter of Hamza a suitable match for you?Or it was said: Why don't you propose to marry the daughter of Hamza, the son of Abd al-Muttalib? Thereupon he said: Hamza is my brother by reason of fosterage.
[3412]
Umm Habiba, the daughter of AbuSufyan, reported: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came to me and I said to him: Have you any inclination towards my the daughter of Abu Sufyan? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Then what should I do ? I said : Marry her.He said : Do you like that ? I said: I am not the exclusive (wife) of yours; I, therefore, wish to join my sister in good. He,said: She is not lawful for me. I said: I have been informed that you have given the proposal of marriage to Durrah daughter of Abu Salama He raid: You mean the daughter of Umm Salama? I said: Yes.He said: Even if she had not been my step-daughter brought up under my guardianship, she would not have been lawful for me, for she is the daughter of my foster-brother (Hamza), for Thuwaiba had suckled me and her father.So do not give me the proposal of the marriage of your daughters and sisters. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[3413]
Umm Habiba, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that she said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): Messenger of Allah, marry my sister 'Azza, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Do you like it? She said: Yes, Messenger of Allah, I am not the exclusive wife of yours, and I wish that the person who joins me in good should be my sister. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: That is not lawful for me. I said: Messenger of Allah, we discussed that You intend to marry Durrah bint Abu Salama.He (the Holy Prophet) said: You mean the daughter of Abu Salama? She said: Yes, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may. peace be upon him) said: Even if she were not the step-daughter of mine, brought up under my guardianship, she would not have been lawful for me, for she is the daughter of my foster-brother. Thuwaiba gave me suck and to Abu Salama (also), so do not offer to me your daughters and sisters.
[3414]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her), Suwaid and Zubair reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: One suckling or two do not make (marriage) unlawful.
[3415]
Umm al-Fadl reported: A bedouin came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) when he was in my house and said: Allah's Apostle, I have had a wife and I married another besides her, and my first wife claimed that she had suckled once or twice my newly married wife, thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: One suckling or two do not make the (marriage) unlawful.
[3416]
Umm Fadl (Allah be pleased with her) reported that a person from Banu 'Amir b. Sa'sa said: Allah's Apostle, does one suckling make the (marriage) unlawful? He said: No.
[3417]
Umm Fadl (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Being suckled once or twice, or one suckling or two, do not make marriage unlawful.
[3418]
In the narration transmitted on the authority of Ibn Bishr there is a mention of two sucklings and Ibn Abu Shaiba has narrated it with a small variation of wording.
[3419]
Umm Fadl (Allah be pleased with her) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be'apon him) having said this: One or two sucklings do not make (the marriage) unlawful.
[3420]
Umm Fadl (Allah be pleased with her) reported that a person asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him): Does one suckling make (the marriage) unlawful? He said: No.
[3421]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with, her) reported that it had been revealed in the Holy Qur'an that ten clear sucklings make the marriage unlawful, then it was abrogated (and substituted) by five sucklings and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) died and it was before that time (found) in the Holy Qur'an (and recited by the Muslims).
[3422]
'Amra reported that she beard 'A'isha (Allah he pleased with her) discussing fosterage which (makes marriage) unlawful; and she ('A'isha) said: There was revealed in the Holy Qur'an ten clear sucklings, and then five clear (sucklings).
[3423]
Ahadith like this is transmitted by 'A'isha through another chain of narrators.
[3424]
' A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Sahla bint Suhail came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be eupon him) and said: Messengerof Allah, I see on the face of Abu Hudhaifa (signs of disgust) on entering of Salim (who is an ally) into (our house), whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Suckle him.She said: How can I suckle him as he is a grown-up man?Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled and said: I already know that he is a young man 'Amr has made this addition in his narration that he participated in the Battle of Badr and in the narration of Ibn 'Umar (the words are): Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) laughed.
[3425]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Salim, the freed slave of Abu Hadhaifa, lived with him and his family in their house.She (i.e. the daughter of Suhail came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Salim has attained (purbety) as men attain, and he understands what they understand, and he enters our house freely, I, however, perceive that something (rankles) in the heart of Abu Hudhaifa, whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to her: Suckle him and you would become unlawful for him, and (the rankling) which Abu Hudhaifa feels in his heart will disappear. She returned and said: So I suckled him, and what (was there) in the heart of Abu Hudhaifa disappeared.
[3426]
Ibn Abu Mulaika reported that al-Qasim b. Muhammad b. Abu Bakr had narrated to him that 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Sahla bint Suhail b. 'Amr came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, Salim (the freed slave of Abu Hudhaifa) is living with us in our house, and he has attained (puberty) as men attain it and has acquired knowledge (of the sex problems) as men acquire, whereupon he said: Suckle him so that he may become unlawful (in regard to marriage) for you He (Ibn Abu Mulaika) said: I refrained from (narrating this hadith) for a year or so on account of fear.I then met al-Qasim and said to him: You narrated to me a hadith which I did not narrate (to anyone) afterwards.He said: What is that? I informed him, whereupon he said: Narrate it on my authority that 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) had narrated that to me.
[3427]
Umm Salama said to 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her): A young boy who is at the threshold of puberty comes to you. I, however, do not like that he should come to me, whereupon 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) said: Don't you see in Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a model for you? She also said: The wife of Abu Hudhaifa said: Messenger of Allah, Salim comes to me and now he is a (grown-up) person, and there is something that (rankles) in the mind of Abu Hudhaifa about him, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Suckle him (so that he may become your foster-child), and thus he may be able to come to you (freely).
[3428]
Zainab daughter of Abu Salama reported: I heard Umm Salama, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon himy, saying to 'A'isha: By Allah, I do not like to be seen by a young boy who has passed the period of fosterage, whereupon she ('A'isha) said: Why is it so?Sahla daughter of Suhail came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, I swear by Allah that I see in the face of Abu Hudhaifa (the signs of disgust) on account of entering of Salim (in the house), whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Suckle him.She (Sahla bint Suhail) said: He has a heard.But he (again) said: Suckle him, and it would remove what is there (expression of disgust) on the face of Abu Hudhaifa.She said: (I did that) and, by Allah, I did not see (any sign of disgust)on the face of Abu Hadhaifa.
[3429]
Umm Salama, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), used to say that all wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) disclaimed the idea that one with this type of fosterage (having been suckled after the proper period) should come to them. and said to 'A'isha: By Allah, we do not find this but a sort of concession given by Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) only for Salim, and no one was ging to be allowed to enter (our houses) with this type of fosterage and we do not subscribe to this view.
[3430]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited me when a man was sitting near me, and he seemed to disapprove of that.And I saw signs of anger on his face and I said: Messenger of Allah, he is my brother by forsterage, whereupon he said: Consider who your brothers are because of fosterage since fosterage is through hunger (i.e. in infancy).
[3431]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Abd al-Ahwas with another chain of transmitters and a slight variation of words.
[3432]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah her pleased with him) reported that at the Battle of Hanain Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent an army to Autas and encountered the enemy and fought with them.Having overcome them and taken them captives, the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace te upon him) seemed to refrain from having intercourse with captive women because of their husbands being polytheists.Then Allah, Most High, sent down regarding that: "And women already married, except those whom your right hands possess (iv. 24)" (i.e. they were lawful for them when their 'Idda period came to an end).
[3433]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) sent a small army.The rest of the hadith is the same except this that he said: Except what your right hands possessout of them are lawful for you; and he did not mention "when their 'idda period comes to an end". This hadith has been reported on the authority of AbuSa'id (al-Khudri) (Allah be pleased with him) through another chain of transmitters and the words are: They took captives (women) on the day of Autas who had their husbands. They were afraid (to have sexual intercourse with them) when this verse was revealed: "And women already married except those whom you right hands posses" (iv. 24)
[3434]
Qatada reported a hadith like this with the same chain of transmitters.
[3435]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas and Abd b. Zam'a (Allah be pleased with them) disputed with each other over a young boy.Sa'd said: Messenger of Allah, he is the son of my brother 'Utba b. Abu Waqqas as he made it explicit that he was his son.Look at his resemblance.Abd b. Zam'a said Messenger of Allah, he is my brother as he was born on the bed of my father from his slave-girl.Allah's Messenger (way peace he upon him) looked at his resembl-. ance and found a clear resemblance with 'Utba. (But) he said: He is yours 0 'Abd (b. Zam'a), for the child is to be attributed to one on whose bed it is born, and stoning for a fornicator.Sauda bint Zam'a,O you should observe veil from him. So he did not see Sauda at all.Muhammad b. Rumh did not make a mention(of the words): "O Abd."
[3436]
A hadith like this is narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Uyaiyna and Ma'mar (and the words are): The child is attributed to him on whose bed he is born; but they did not mention this: "For a fornicator there is stoning."
[3437]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The child is to be attributed to one on whose bed he is born, and for a fornicator there is stoning.
[3438]
A hadith like this is narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[3439]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) visited me looking pleased as if his face was glistening and said: Did you see that Mujazziz cast a glance at Zaid b. Haritha and Usama b. Zaid, and (then) said: Some (of the features) of their feet are found in the others?
[3440]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: One day Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited me looking pleased and he said: 'A'isha, don't you see Mujazziz al-Mudliji?(He) entered (my house) and saw Usama and Zaid with a rug over them covering their heads, but their feet appeared, and (he) said: These feet are related to one another.
[3441]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: A physiognomist visited (our house) and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was present, and Usama b. Zaid and Zaid b. Haritha were both lying asleep, and he (the physiognomist), said: These feet are related to one another. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was pleased to hear this, and he was happy and informed 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) about it.
[3442]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri and Yunus said: Mujazziz was a physiognomist.
[3443]
'Abd al-Malik b.Abu Bakr b. Abd al-Rahman b.al-Harith b.Hisham reported on the authority of his father from Umm Salama (Allah be pleased with her) that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) married Umm Salama, he stayed with her for three nights, and said: There is no lack of estimation on the part of your husband for you.If you wish I can stay with you for a week, but in case I stay with you for a week, then I shall have to stay for a week with all my wives.
[3444]
Ibn Abu Bakr b. Abd al-Rahman reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) married Umm Salama and she stayed with him (during the night), and it was dawn, he (the Holy Prophet) said to her: There is no lack of estimation for you on the part of your husband.So if you desire I can spend a week with you, and if you like I may spend three (nights). and then I will visit you in turn. She said: Spend three (nights).
[3445]
Abu Bakr b. 'Abd al-Rahman reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) married Umm Salama and he visited her, and when he intended to come out, she caught hold of his cloth. whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If you so desire, I can extend the time (of my stay) with you, but then I shall have to calculate the time (that I stay with you and shall have to spend the same time with other wives).For the virgin woman, (her husband has to stay with her) for a week, and for the woman previously married it is three days.
[3446]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Humaid.
[3447]
Umm Salama (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) married her, and he (the narrator) made mention of so many things in this connection (and one of them was this) that he said: If you desire that I spend a week with you, I shall have to spend a week with my (other) wives, and if spend a week with you, I shall have to spend a week with my (other) wives.
[3448]
Anas b. Malik reported: When anyone who has already a wife marries virgin, he should stay with her for seven nights (and then turn to his other wife), but when anyone having a virgin with him (as his wife) marries a woman who has been previously married he should stay with her for three nights.Khalid (one of the narrators) said.If I were to say that it could be directly traced to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him). I would have told the truth, but he (Hadrat Anas) said: Such is the tradition.
[3449]
Abu Qilaba reported on the authority of Anas: It is the Sunnph to stay with a virgin (after having married her) for a week.Khalid (one of the narrators) said: If wish I can say that it can be traced up to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him).
[3450]
Anas (Allah be pleased with him) reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had ninewives.So when he divided (his stay) with them, the turn of the first wife did not come but on the ninth (day). They (all the wives) used to gather every night in the house of one where he had to come (and stay that night).It was (the night when he had to stay) in the house of 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her), when Zainab came there.He (the Holy Prophet) stretched his hand towards her (Zainab), whereupon she ('A'isha) said: It is Zainab. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) withdrew his hand.There was an altercation between the two until their voices became loud (and it was at that time) when Iqama was pronounced for prayer.There happened to come Abu Bakr and he heard their voices and said: Messenger of Allah, (kindly) come for prayer, and throw dust in their moths. So the Prophet (may peace be upon him) went out.'A'isha said: When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) would finish his prayer there would also come Abu Bakr and he would do as he does (on such occasions, i.e. reprimanding).When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had finished his prayer, there came to her Abu Bakr. and spoke to her ('A'isha) in stern words and said: Do you behave like this?
[3451]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: Never did I find any woman more loving to me than Sauda bint Zam'a.I wished I could be exactly like her who was passionate.As she became old, she had made over her day (which she had to spend) with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to 'A'isha. She said: I have made over my day with you to 'A'isha. So Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) allotted two days to 'A'isha, her own day (when it was her turn) and that of Sauda.
[3452]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of narrators (and the words are): When Sauda became old (the rest of the hadith is the same) and in the narration of Sharik there is an addition (of these words: "She was the first woman whom he (Allah's Apostle) married after me."
[3453]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: I felt jealous of the women who offered themselves to Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him) and said: Then when Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed this: "You may defer any one of them you wish, and take to yourself any you wish; and if you desire any you have set aside (no sin is chargeable to you)" (xxxiii. 51), I ('A'isha.) said: It seems to me that your Lord hastens to satisfy your desire.
[3454]
Hisham reported on the authority of his father that 'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) used to say: Does the woman not feel shy of offering herself to a man?Then Allah the Exalted and Glorious revealed this verse: "You may defer any of them you wish and take to yourself any you wish." I ('A'isha said): It seems to me that your Lord hastens to satisfy your desire.
[3455]
'Ata related that when they were with Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) at the funeral of Maimuna In Sarif, Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) said: This is the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him); so when you lift her bier, do not shake her or disturb her, but be gentle, for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had nine wives, with eight of whom he shared his time, but to one of them, he did not allot a share.'Ati said: The one to whom he did not allot a share of time was Safiyya,daughter of Huyayy b. Akhtab.
[3456]
Ibn Juraij narrated a hadith with the same chain of transmitters, and she (Hadrat Maimuna) was the last of them to die at Medina.
[3457]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A woman may be married for four reasons: for her property, her status. her beauty and her religion, so try to get one who is religious, may your hand be besmeared with dust.
[3458]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I married a woman during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be. upon him).I met the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: Jabir, have you married?I said: Yes.He said: A virgin or one previously marrried? I said: With due previously married, whereupon he said: Why did you not marry a virgin with whom you could sport? I said: Allah's Messenger, I have sisters; I was afraid that she might intervene between me and them, whereupon he said: Well and good, if it is so.A woman is married for four reasons, for her religion, her property, her status, her beauty, so you should choose one with religion.May your hands cleave to dust.
[3459]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I married a woman, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me: Have you married?I said: Yes.He said: Is it a virgin or a previously married one (widow or divorced)?I said: With a previously married one, whereupon he said: Where had you been (away) from the amusements of virgins? Shu'ba said: I made a mention of it to 'Amr b. Dinar and he said: I too heard from Jabir making mention of that (that Allah's Apostle) said: Why didn't you marry a girl, so that you might sport with her and she might sport with you?
[3460]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: 'Abdullah died and he left (behind him) nine or seven daughters. I married a woman who had been previously married.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me: Jabir, have you married?I said: Yes.He (again) said: A virgin or one previously married?I said: Messenger of Allah, with one who was previously married, whereupon he said: Why didn't you marry a young girl so that you could sport with her and she could sport with you, or you could amuse with her and she could amuse with you?I said to him: 'Abdullah died (he fell as martyr in Uhud) and left nine or seven daughters behind him; I, therefore, did not approve of the idea that I should bring a (girl) like them, but I preferred to bring a woman who should look after them and teach them good manners, whereupon he (Allah's Messenger) said: May Allah bless you, or he supplicated (for the) good (to be) conferred on me (by Allah).
[3461]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me: Jabir, have you married ? The rest of the hadith is the same up to (the words): "The woman would look after them and comb them." He (Allah's Messenger), said: You did well.But no mention is made of the subsequent portion.
[3462]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We were with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in an expedition.When we returned I urged my camel to move quickly as it was slow.There met me a rider from behind me and he goaded it with an iron-tipped stick which he had with him.My camel moved forward like the best that you have ever seen. As I turned (my face) I found him to be Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) He said: Jabir, what hastens you?I said: Messenger of Allah, I am newly wedded. whereupon he said: Is it a virgin that you have married or one previously married? I said: With one previously married.He said: Why not a young girl so that you could play with her and she could play with you?Then when we arrived at and were about to enter Medina he said: Wait, so that we may enter by night (i.e. in the evening) in order that the woman with dishevelled hair may comb it, and the woman whose husband had been away may get herself clean; and when you enter (then you have the) enjoyment (of tho wife's company).
[3463]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with him) reported: I went out with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on an expedition, but my camel delayed me. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to me and said to me: Jabir,I said: Yes.Allah's Messenger, (here I am at your beck and call) He said: What is the matter with you? I said: My camel has delayed me and is tired, so I have lagged behind.He (the Holy Prophet) got down and goaded it with a crooked stick and then said: Mount it.So I mounted and (to my great surprise) I saw it (moving so quickly that) I had to restrain it (from going ahead of) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).He (the Holy Prophet) (in the course of journey said to me): Have you married? I said: Yes.He (again) said: Is it with a virgin or one previously married?I said. With one previously married, whereupon he (again) said: Why not with a young girl with whom you could sport and she could have sported with you? I said: I have sisters, so I preferred to marry a woman who could keep them together (as one family). who could comb them and look after them.He said: You are about to go (to your house), and there you have the enjoyment (of the wife's company).He again said: Do you want to sell your camel? I said: Yes.So he bought it from me for one u'qiya (of silver), Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) arrived (at Medina) and I arrived in the evening.I went to the mosque and found him at the door of the mosque, and said: Is it now that you have arrived?I said: Yes, He said: Leave your camel, and enter (the mosque) and offer two rak'ahs.So I entered and offered two rak'ahs of prayer, and then returned.He (the Holy Prophet) then commanded Bilal to weigh out one 'uqiya (of silver) tor me.Bilal weighed that out for me (lowering the scale of) balance.So I proceeded and as I turned my back he said: Call for me, Jabir.So I was called back, and I said (to myself): He would return me the camel, and nothing was more displeasing to me than this (that after having received the price I should also get the camel).He said: Take your camel and keep its price with you, (also).
[3464]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah (Allah be pleased with them) reported: We were with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in a journey, and I was riding a camel meant for carrying water and it lagged behind all persons.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) hit it or goaded it (I think) with something he had with him.And after it (it moved so quickly) that it went ahead of all persons and it struggled with me (to move faster than I permitted It) and I had to restrain it. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Do you sell it at such and such (price)?May Allah grant you pardon.I said: Allah's Apostle, it is yours.He (again) said: Do you sell it at such and such (price)?May Allah grant you pardon.' I said: Allah's Apostle, it is yours.He said to me: Have you married after the death of your father? I said: Yes. He (again) said: With one previously married or a virgin ? I said: With one previously married.He said: Why didn't you marry a virgin who might amuse you and you might amuse her, and she might sport with you and you might sport with her? Abu Nadra said: That was the common phrase which the Muslims spoke: "You do such and such (thing) and Allah may grant you pardon."
[3465]
'Abdullah b. Amr reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The whole world is a provision, and the best object of benefit of the world is the pious woman.
[3466]
AbuHuraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Woman is like a rib. When you attempt to straighten it, you would break it.And if you leave her alone you would benefit by her, and crookedness will remain in her.A hadith like this is reported by another chain of narrators
[3467]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported: Woman has been created from a rib and will in no way be straightened for you; so if you wish to benefit by her, benefit by her while crookedness remains in her. And if you attempt to straighten her, you will break her, and breaking her is divorcing her.
[3468]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who believes in Allah and the Hereafter, if he witnesses any matter he should talk in good terms about it or keep quiet.Act kindly towards woman, for woman is created from a rib, and the most crooked part of the rib is its top.If you attempt to straighten it, you will break it, and if you leave it, its crookedness will remain there.So act kindly towards women.
[3469]
Ab Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A believing man should not hate a believing woman; if he dislikes one of her characteristics, he will be pleased with another.
[3470]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him).
[3471]
Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Had it not been for Eve, woman would have never acted unfaithfully towards her husband.
[3472]
Hammam b. Munabbih said: These are some of the ahadith which Abu Huraira (Allah be pleased with him) narrated to us from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and one of these (this one): Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Had it not been for Bani Isra'il, food would not have become stale, and meal would not have gone bad; and had it not been for Eve, a woman would never have acted unfaithfully toward her husband.
[3473]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that he divorced his wife while she was menstruating during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).'Umar b. Khattib (Allah be pleased with him) asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about it, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Command him ('Abdullah b. 'Umar) to take her back (and keep her) and pronounce divorce when she is purified and she again enters the period of menstruation and she is again purified (after passing the period of menses), and then if he so desires he may keep her and if he desires divorce her (finally) before touching her (without having an intercourse with her), for that is the period of waiting ('ldda) which God, the Exalted and Glorious, has commanded for the divorce of women.
[3474]
Abdullah (b.'Umar) reported that he divorced a wife of his with the pronouncement of one divorce during the period of menstruation.Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded him to take her back and keep her until she was purified, and then she entered the period of menses in his (house) for the second time. And he should wait until she was purified of her menses.And then if he would decide to divorce her, he should do so when she was purified before having a sexual intercourse with her; for that was the 'Idda which Allah had commanded for the divorce of women.Ibn Rumh in his narration made this addition: When 'Abdullah was asked about it, he said to one of them: If you have divorced your wife with one pronouncement or two (then you can take her back), for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded me to do it; but if you have divorced her with three pronouncements, then she is forbidden for you until she married another husband, and you disobeyed Allah in regard to the divorce of your wife what He had commanded you. (Muslim said: The word "one divorce" used by Laith is good.)
[3475]
Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I divorced my wife during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) when she was in the state of menses.'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) made a mention of it to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: Command him to take her back and leave her (in that state) until she is purified.Then (let her) enter the period of second menses, and when she is purified, then divorce her (finally) before having a sexual intercourse with her, or retain her (finally).That is the 'Idda (the prescribed period) which Allah commanded (to be kept in view) while divorcing the women. 'Ubaidullah reported: I said to Nafi': What became of that divorce (pronounced within 'Idda) ? He said: It was as one which she counted.
[3476]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah, but he made no mention of the words of Ubaidullah that he said to Nafi'.
[3477]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that he divorced his wife during the period of menses. 'Umar (Allah be, pleas'ed with him) asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and he commanded him ('Abdullah b. 'Umar) to have her back and then allow her respite until she enters the period of the second menses, and then allow her respite until she is purified, then divorce her (finally) before touching her (having a sexual intercourse with her), for that is the prescribed period which Allah commanded (to be kept in view) for divorcing the women.When Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) was asked about the person who divorces his wife in the state of menses, he said: If you pronounced one divorce or two, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had commanded him to take her back, and then allow her respite until she enters the period of the second menses, and then allow her respite until she is purified, and then divorce her (finally) before touching her (having a sexual intercourse with her); and if you have pronounced (three divorces at one and the same time) you have in fact disobeyed your Lord with regard to what He commanded you about divorcing your wife.But she is however (finally separated from you).
[3478]
Abdullah b. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I divorced my wife while she was in the state of menses.'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) made mention of it to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he was enraged and he said: Command him to take her back until she enters the second ensuing menses other than the one in which he divorced her and in case he deems proper to divorce her, he should pronounce divorce (finally) before touching her (in the period) when she is purified of her menses, and that is the prescribed period in regard to divorce as Allah has commanded.'Abdullah made a pronouncement of one divorce and it was counted in case of divorce.'Abdullah took her back as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had commanded him.A hadith like this was reported on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of narrators.Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them), however, said: I took her back, and counted this pronouncement of divorce (as valid) with which I divorced her.
[3479]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that he divorced his wife while she was in the state of menses.'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) made mention of it to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he said: Command him to take her back, then divorce her when she is pure or she is pregnant.
[3480]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported that he divorced his wife while she was in her menses.'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about that, and he said: Command him to take her back until she is pure and then she enters the second menses and then becomes pure.Then either divorce her (finally) or retain her.
[3481]
Ibn Sirin reported: One who was blameless (as a narrator) narrated to me for twenty years that Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) pronounced three divorces to his wife while she was in the state of menses.He was commanded to take her back. I neither blamed them (the narrators) nor recognised the hadith (to be perfectly genuine) until I met Abu Ghallab Yunus b. Jubair al-Bahili and he was very authentic, and he narrated to me that he had asked Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with there) and he narrated it to him that he made one pronouncement of divorce to his wife as she was in the state of menses, but he was commanded to take her back.I said: Was it counted (as one pronouncement)?He said: Why not, was I helpless or foolish ?
[3482]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority of Ayyub with a slight variation of words.
[3483]
Ayyub reported a hadith like this with the same chain of narrators and he said: Umar (Allah be pleased with him) asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about it and he commanded him that he should take her back until she is divorced in the state of purity without having a sexual intercourse with her, and said: Divorce her in the beginning of her 'Idda or her 'Idda commences.
[3484]
Yunus b. Jubair reported: I said to Ibn'Umar (Allah be pleased with them): A person divorcedhis wife while she was in the state of menses, whereupon he said: Do you know 'Abdullah b. Umar (Allah be pleased with them), for he divorced his wife in the state of menses. 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and asked him, and he (the Holy Prophet) commanded him that he should take her back, and she started her 'Idda. I said to him: When a person divorces his wife, and she is in the state of menses, should that pronouncement of divorce be counted?He said: Why not, was he hopless or foolish?
[3485]
Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) reported: I divorced my wife while she was in the state of menses. 'Umar (Allah he pleased wish him) came toAllah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and made mention of that to him, whereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) told that be should take her back, and when she is pure he may divorce her. if he would so wish. I (one of the narrators) said to Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them): Did you count (this pronouncement of divorce) in her case?He said: What (after all) prevents him from doing so?Do you find him (Ibn Umar) either helpless or foolish?
[3486]
Anas b. Sirin reported: I asked Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) about the woman whom he had divorced.He said: I divorced her while she was in the state of menses.It was mentioned to 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) and he then made a mention of that to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: Command him to take her back and when the period of menses is over, then (he may divorce her in the state of her purity.He (Ibn Umar) said: So I took her back, then divorced her in her purity.I (the narrator) said: Did you count that divorce which you pronounced in the state of menses?He said: Why should I not have counted that?Was I helpless or foolish?
[3487]
Anas b. Sirin reported that he had heard Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) as saying.I divorced my wife while she was in the state of menses.'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and informed him about it, whereupon he (Allah's Apostle) said: Command him to take her back and when she is pure, then divorce her.I said to Ibn 'Umar Allah be pleased with them): Did you count that pronouncement of divorce? He said: Why not? This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters but with a slight variation in wording.
[3488]
Ibn Tawus narrated on the authority of his father that Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) was asked about the person who divorced his wife in the state of menses, whereupon he said: Do you know 'Abdullah b. Umar?He said: Yes.He said: It was he who divorced his wife jn the state of menses and 'Umar went to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and gave him this information. and he commanded him that he should take her back; and he (Abu Tawus) said: I did not hear any addition to this (hadith) from my father.
[3489]
Abu Zubair reported that he heard 'Abd al-Rahman b. Aiman (the freed slave of 'Azza) say that he asked Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) and Abu Zubair heard: What is your opinion about the person who divorced his wife in the state of menses?Thereupon he said: Ibn Umar (Allah be pleased with them) divorced his wife during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) while she was in the state of menses. Upon this Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) told him to take her back and so he took her back and he (further) said: When she is pure, then either divorce her or retain her.Ibn 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) said that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) then recited this verse: "O Apostle, when you divorce women, divorce them at the commencement of their prescribed period" (Ixv 1).
[3490]
A hadith like this is reported on the same authority (but with this difference that the narrator) 'Abd al-Rahman b. Aiman (was mentioned) as the freed slave of 'Urwa (Imam Muslim said: He made a mistake who said that it was 'Urwa; it was in fact the freed slave of 'Azza.)
[3491]
Ibn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported that the (pronouncement) of three divorces during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and that of Abu Bakr and two years of the caliphate of Umar (Allah be pleased with him) (was treated) as one.But Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) said: Verily the people have begun to hasten in the matter in which they are required to observe respite.So if we had imposed this upon them, and he imposed it upon them.
[3492]
Abu Sahba' said toIbn 'Abbas (Allah be pleased with them): Do you know that three (divorces) were treated as one during the lifetime of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and that of Abu Bakr, and during three (years) of the caliphate of Umar (Allah be pleased with him)?Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) said: Yes.
[3493]
Abu al-Sahba' said to Ibn 'Abbas: Enlighten us with your information whether the three divorces (pronounced at one and the same time) were not treated as one during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and Abu Bakr.He said: It was in fact so, but when during the caliphate of 'Umar (Allah be pleased with him) people began to pronounce divorce frequently, he allowed them to do so (to treat pronouncements of three divorces in a single breath as one).
[3494]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported about (declaring of one's woman) unlawful as an oath which must be atoned, and Ibn 'Abbas said: Verily, there is in the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) a model pattern for you.
[3495]
Ibn Abbas (Allah be pleased with them) reported: When a man declares his wife unlawful for himself that is an oath which must be atoned, and he said: There is in the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) a noble pattern for you.
[3496]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) narrated that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) used to spend time with Zainab daughter of Jahsh and drank honey at her house.She ('A'isha further) said: I and Hafsa agreed that one whom Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) would visit first should say: I notice that you have an odour of the Maghafir (gum of mimosa).He (the Holy Prophet) visited one of them and she said to him like this, whereupon he said: I have taken honey in the house of Zainab bint Jabsh and I will never do it again.It was at this (that the following verse was revealed): 'Why do you hold to be forbidden what Allah has made lawful for you ... (up to).If you both ('A'isha and Hafsa) turn to Allah" up to: "And when the Holy Prophet confided an information to one of his wives" (lxvi. 3). This refers to his saying: But I have taken honey.
[3497]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) liked sweet (dish) and honey.After saying the afternoon prayer he used to visit his wives going close to them.So he went to Hafsa and stayed with her more than what was his usual stay.I ('A'isha) asked about that.It was said to me: A woman of her family had sent her a small vessel of honey as a gift, and she gave to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) from that a drink. I said: By Allah, we would also contrive a device for him. I mentioned that to Sauda, and said: When he (Allah's Apostle) would visit you and draw close to you, say to him: Allah's Messenger, have you taken maghafir? And he would'say to you: No. Then say to him: What is this odour? And Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) felt it very much that unpleasant odour should emit from him.So he would say to you: Hafsa has given me a drink of honey. Then you should say to him: The honey-bees might have sucked 'Urfut, and I would also say the same to him and. Safiyya, you should also say this.So when he (the Holy Prophet) came to Sauda, she said: By Him besides whom there is no god, it was under compulsion that I had decided to state that which you told me when he would be at a little distance at the door.So when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came near, she said: Messenger of Allah, did you eat Maghafir?He said: No. She (again) said: Then what is this odour?He said: Hafsa gave me honey to drink.She said: The honey-bee might have sucked 'Urfut.When he came to me I told him like this.He then visited Safiyya and she also said to him like this.When he (again) visited Hafsa, she said: Messenger of Allah, should I not give you that (drink)? He said: I do not need that. Sauda said: Hallowed be Allah, by Him we have (contrived) to make that (honey) unlawful for him.I said to her: Keep quiet.This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Urwa with the same chain of transmitters.
[3498]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported: When the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was commanded to give option to his wives, he started it from me saying: I am going to mention to you a matter which you should not (decide) in haste until you have consulted your parents.She said that he already knew that my parents would never allow me to seek separation from him She said: Then he said: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: Prophet, say to thy wives: If you desire this world's life and its adornment, then come, I will give you a provision and allow you to depart a goodly departing; and if you desire Allah and His Messenger and the abode of the Hereafter, then Allah has prepared for the doers of good among you a great reward She is reported to have said : About what should I consult my parents, for I desire Allah and His Messenger and the abode of the Hereafter? She ('A'isha) said: Then all the wives of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did as I had done.
[3499]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sought our permission when he had a (turn to spend) a day with (one of his wives) amongst us (whereas he wanted to visit his other wives too).It was after this that this verse was revealed: "Thou mayest put off whom thou pleasest of them, and take for thee whom thou pleasest" (xxxiii. 5). Mu'adha said to her: What did you say to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) when he sought your permission ? She said: I used to say: If it had the option in this I would not have (allowed anyone) to have precedence over me.
[3500]
'A'isha reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave us the option (to get divorce) but we did not deem it as divorce.